Why? Because of how you reacted in the morning. Why did you have a bad day?
Level 19: MP Cost: 20, Duration: 174 seconds, ATT: +29.
Almost as a godsend, former President Moi decided to throw his weight behind the NO campaign thus installing tagging all the campaigners against the Proposed Constitution with the contagion of misrule, dictatorship, corruption, patronage appointments, land grabbing, torture and state terror that many Kenyans associate with the KANU rule that started with founding President Jomo Kenyatta and ended with ignominious defeat of Moi’s hand picked successor at 2002 elections when NARC, Kibaki and Raila came out on top.
Brookings’ 5-part series on many facets of the 2012 Party Congress, at which like 3/4 of China’s leadership will turn over. The rising leaders are from the “lost generation,” those sent to labor in the countryside instead of to school during the Cultural Revolution, and bring an unprecedented diversity of experiences. And because once they finally got to study they really dug in, they bring comparatively very high levels of education (PhDs) in diverse fields. The technocratic engineers in charge today, their time is over….Many thanks for this to Harry Williams of Carleton College, my Fulbright colleague now up north.
It’s jarring to be called a “bitch” by anyone, much less by a man you don’t know, who feels justified calling you that because you won’t smile at his leering, pock-marked face after he demanded that you do. Even though nothing physically happened to me, I was upset by the incident for the rest of the day. I finally realized why I couldn’t get the encounter out of my head: This was the first time, in my young adult life, that I actively felt like an object.
i am leaning toward the morten table lamp, but will probably wait for a few more weeks before i commit.
Adorable dog not included.
ruffle fabric
Southwestern Braggot (Carvers) A unique and very fruity beer brewed with the green fruits of Prickly Pear Cactus. Brewer, Erik Maxson.
I was aggravated that I am not going to be able to go to MoVal until possibly May (my car can’t make that trip again– not in its current state).
I'll carry her round in my pocket.
Preheat oven to 350°F. Grease 9" by 5" glass or metal loaf pan. In small bowl, combine flour, baking powder, baking soda and salt. In large bowl, with mixer at low speed, beat butter and sugar until blended. Increase speed to high; beat until light and fluffy, about 5 minutes. Reduce speed to low; add eggs, one at a time, beating well after each addition, occasionally scraping bowl with rubber spatula. Beat in vanilla. Add flour mixture alternately with sour cream, beginning and ending with flour mixture. Beat until smooth, occasionally scraping bowl. Transfer half of batter to medium bowl. Add cocoa to batter remaining in large bowl and beat until blended. Alternately spoon vanilla and chocolate batters into pan. With a knife, cut and swirl through batters to create marbled effect. Bake until a toothpick inserted in the centre comes out clean, about 1 hour. Cool in pan on a wire rack 10 minutes. Run knife around cake to loosen from sides of pan. Remove from pan to cool completely on rack.
My fifth thought was that places of 'higher learning' haven't advanced much, if they need a sign like that.
I’d have a pet lion, and I’d sleep on its back as it brings me to school. I was a pretty sleep deprived kid, don’t you think? My school bus picked me up at 4:30am or 5:00am. Everyday.
but I will NOT be making them EVER again!
Basic usage is free, and there's an upgrade which only costs $25.00 a year. Very reasonable for all the fun you can have. Besides the slightly spooky highlight, I added 4 details to this photo. Can you find them?
Research Paper . . . 25%
Cat Cafe Bliss – #1 Taiyuan Rd.
The chief police reports that they found a witness – an attendant who were with the princess that night – and admits that she was distracted and didn’t immediately noticed that the princess slipped. The attendant was scared and she ran away. She fought when the guards captured her and was killed in the process. The princess’ father says that the attendant had already received punishment. It’s odd for the ministers to insist that it’s an accident – especially the princess’ father. It’s possible that the police lied and the story is fabricated. But why go through all that?
I’ve read that hackers are a good thing because they keep everyone else on their toes and keeps the security systems up-to-date. I guess reformed hackers are a valuable resource.
About six months ago. Though high on the list as question #4, it never gets much of a reaction, as if it were part of an official script that must be read before continuing with the interview. Many times it seemed as if the next question was already forming in their cheekbones as I babbled unimportant dates, routes, countries, modes of transport….
pale rose and meadow (small balls on top)
Right now I’m listening to “The Show”. It was originally sung by Lenka, but I’m listening to the cover by Kerris Dorsey. She acted in the movie “Moneyball”, you know, that baseball movie with Brad Pitt. I don’t know why, but my mom has such a crush on him. She couldn’t contain herself when we watched “Meet Joe Black”, seriously, she cried for the last 45 minutes of it…it wasn’t even sad! Though, I’m supposed to be the unemotional one in the family, so maybe I’m not a good source…
It's funny that I had to start a blog to truly realize that. Since I was 20 - so for the past 10 years - I've wanted to write a book. For a while, I think it was just a far fetched dream. It was neat to think "wouldn't it be great to be a published author?" However, Simply Lyndsay made me realize that dream was real. It didn't matter the subject. I just loved to find the appropriate words and perfect sentence structure to convey my thoughts or purpose of the piece.
For more than a decade, child protection experts have identified a repeated pattern of sex offending in towns and cities across northern England and the Midlands involving groups of older men who groom and abuse vulnerable girls aged 11 to 16 after befriending them on the street.
“What the hell…Judson?” She looked up at him, her knees shook, her body still inflamed with fever.
A. prohibited slavery in any territory taken from Mexico during the war.
It does happen. Now and then. Former Republican presidential candidate Herman Cain recounted in his 2011 biography his own Horatio Alger story of how his father told him to keep his nose to the grindstone and to work hard. He followed that advice and rose to become CEO at Godfather Pizza. Okay, but it didn’t hurt that his dad was a chauffeur to the CEO at Coca Cola who was willing to pay for his services in stock shares, and that his father’s connections helped young Cain land a job with Coke after graduate school, where, with help from a mentor (that all-too-rare benevolent stranger), he was introduced to other business opportunities.
Love the bow on this shirt. Soo sweet and pulls in at the waist for
Sep 13 2008 2:00P Landis Festival Larchmont
icee party
As life unfolds I am in awe of the sheer abundance of opportunities that are at my fingertips. Choosing between the opportunities is the crux of life. Weighing options, calculating risks, understanding the ramifications. A lot of thought needs to be given to some while other choices are as easy as a warm embrace.
There’s other stuff the season probably gets wrong, and certainly in tone it shifts wildly all over the place from one episode to the next, but as is always the case (or at least always my case) with Torchwood, it gets more right than wrong. It’s the journey that makes Miracle Day alternately fun and horrifiying, not the destination. That’s why even if the finale feels a little off, or maybe doesn’t make a whole lot of sense, or, alternately, is perhaps too damn convenient, I’m not inclined to
Anything to promote treating others
Over the border
With kind regards
Cast : Alastair Sim, Jane Wenham, Brian Worth, Eileen Moore, Olga Lindo, Arthur Young, Bryan Forbes, Norman Bird, Charles Saynor, Olwen Brookes, John Welsh, Frances Gowens, Barbara Everest, George Woodbridge
Is the nation turning 51 less of a big deal than 50? Of course not. In fact, in many ways, it is a bigger deal since we as a nation will be a year older; we have been together a year longer; and, probably achieved more as a nation than a year before.
Fiskars: paper trimmer
So, I weigh more. Now what? Thankfully for me, I know what to do. Been there, done that after all. To help motivate me, I joined my gym's Pound for Pound challenge. This is an 8 week challenge to see who can loose the most body fat. I had my initial weigh in and body fat measurements taken on Saturday. Ugh. I may not like the measurements, but it is a starting point. And, I am finally ready to admit the gains and change my behaviors to achieve losses. It's a new year and I am ready to start out fresh.
Allen & Ginter baseball cards first debuted in 1887 and quickly became the most popularly collected cards of the time. They honoured champions from around the world, including boxers, wrestlers, and baseball players.
You with no more stories I will regale?
This post is a lot harder to write than I thought. So I’ll just start at the beginning.
And just remember
An Occupy Wall Street protester who was pepper-sprayed by police has started a romance with the demonstrator who helped treat her. Robert Grodt, 24, a volunteer medic, rushed to help Kaylee Dedrick, 24... temporarily blinded by the spray on September 24... Miss Dedrick...calls herself gay on social networking sites... found romance with the male fellow protester. SNIP
“Using these special UV-resistant blue pigments in a high quality Midas 240 acrylic, our blues will last exceptionally well”, said Midas Earthcote Marketing Director, Simon Fraser. “Collaborating with ICC on the complexities of colour means we are able to produce better quality products and many technically unique colour solutions for the industry.”
WTF? WTF? (I'm not pleased to hear this). I've not bothered to get a home phone. The last one I had in Seoul was just a waste of money. I rarely used it.
Next week I'll be sharing an album you can make for all of your fabulous 4th of July pictures! Until then...
"Submission doesn't mean that we are weak-minded, feeble, or frail. It means that we're empowered by choice, and that we're dedicated to esteeming others higher than ourselves."
I had asked Margaret Atwood on Twitter to wave to me and she did indeed give some very good waves - surely one of them was for me?
You will then stand victorious as an overcomer
Arms stretched out like a PTI.
Before loving someone we should be able to love ourselves. Self love. I think that nobody liked me before because I used to hate me. When I began to love who I was/am, a lot of people started to notice me, and my body figure haven't changed a lot. Now I love myself even more, I like taking care of myself. I do sports, I take care of my skin, I eat well, I read, and I love doing that, I feel happy and complete. I don't have any bad habit and I'm in control of myself. When we control ourselves, and when we know ourselves we have power above us and people who don't know themselves. I am powerful.
Here is is:
This is old news if you follow me on instagram or facebook, but to the blogging community, Luna hasn't existed until I introduce her. We've been searching for a buddy for Samson, our adorable beagle mix, 3 years old, and diagnosed with Epilepsy in September of 2011. After much debate and consideration we decided against the medication for epilepsy as it would shorten his lifespan by several years. We feed him an all natural, grain-free diet. I guess you could say he's a carnivore without any bread :) We read on hundreds of blogs that the grain free diet does exactly what the meds do: Regulate the seizures. Because Epilepsy isn't curable by drugs (even in humans) the meds space the seizures apart so they don't cause brain damage. We're good so long as he has no more than 1 a week. It's when the seizures are back to back that the brain can't recover and that's when brain damage occurs.
Migratory Bird Refuge – West of Brigham City – contains a WWII internment camp that was built before the game preserve was established.
"Come with a full bladder" said the nurse "and the letter of referral from your consultant". So on Friday morning I put both in my handbag and presented myself at eight in the AM, belly-up and bare, for an ultrasound. The doctor slathered me in cold jelly and ran the scanner across my goosebumped gut, sighed and then told me that I needed to go and have a cup of tea or ten and come back. "But I'm bursting!" I whined as I flopped back down off the bed and wriggled back into my dress. "Come back at nine" he said "and you will be".
Article 16 states, “in cases of flagrante delicto, any person may arrest the offender and his accomplices, turning them over without delay to the nearest authorities.” Therefore, the Mexican constitution appears to grant Mexican citizens the right to arrest illegal aliens and hand them over to police for prosecution.
I got through the game with my partner, feeling honestly joyful at the soaring parts and sad at the bittersweet parts. I cried when it was over; not because it was sad, but because it was just such a beautiful thing when I realized I’d been playing with a real person. My entire gaming life has been very, very cynical toward people on the internet. I’ve seen the comment threads, heard the rants, known the bile that comes out when people think they’re untouchable or anonymous. But after Journey I keep coming back to the times when all I could think about was staying close to my partner and tentatively walking forward through the dark with them, and how they didn’t leave me behind but instead guided me to hidden symbols and waited for me when they’d jumped to a platform ahead of where I was. I appreciate having a game that lets me put down my defenses long enough to enjoy the companionship of a faceless person online. It’s something that’s pretty special.
But your statement, "just the kind of clever idea your high school science teacher would be wrong about," is, in general, precisely the kind of thing I'm railing against.
Warrior appears at first glance to be a film about the popular brutality of mixed martial arts, but instead reveals itself as one of great depth and emotion. It explores the difficult lives of a fractured family with painful histories both individual and shared. These histories mix with present-day motivations to create tangibly real characterisations that utilise the fighting as a backdrop rather than the central theme.
His howls reverberate across the land.
Herman Chittison (piano)
I look for Little Man. Try to hear what’s going on. My eyes won’t see. My ears won’t hear. I think of hitting a homer at the stadium, see the ball curve. I think of Stevie smiling. I think of my giraffe, of yellow and blue.
This is how a training stud farm was teaching the horses, it’s horrible abuse & I will stick on this case to see if any arrests were made because the person who did this needs bloody flogging. Apparently the trainer thought he would use bale band to tie the horses mouths to their chest.
Here are the notes I put on the album on Cdbaby:
Marcos Valle - vocals and piano
Get rid of them as fast as you can. Even though it might hurt at first.
On the way out I snapped a photo of the actual stairs that Victor Hugo actually walked up:
I relied on information from the Hunter Community Environment Centre and a local group (Correct Planning & Consultation for Mayfield Group). I certainly don’t trust the Environmental Assessment created for Port Waratah Coal Services, but I’m also not sure how reliable the information from the other groups is either. I suspect they have been careful in their research and I certainly do not question their motives. They do, however, have an agenda to push (which I fully support) so I think there is a danger that we might be selective in our data and present the worse case scenario .
Riggs and other researchers have discovered that in areas where anomalous happenings occur utter silence, or conversely, strange noises, pervade the area prior to and during those happenings. This, of course, gives rise to some very basic questions about human and non-human perception.
And if you'd like to keep up on all of this AND find out about a giveaway that I will be doing very soon, I'd love for you to come "like" the new Facebook page I've just set up for the shop. I promise not to totally overwhelm your news feed. :)
Meanwhile, I'm so cautious about what I say to her regarding the things she can no longer do to/with Mommy because the last thing I was is for to associate her loss of freedom with this "baby" that we speak of. For example, when she wants me to pick her up, I tell her I can't because of my back, rather than that it's because of the baby. I tell her my tummy hurts when she tries to jump on me and things like that. I mean, I know she's seen me get much sicker and more tired over the last few months and I suppose she's still just accrediting that to one of the many terrible things "my baby has done to me." Lol
Starting at the hairline and using E21 just bring the colour out into the face (not too far) also use the same Copic to colour the cross hatched sections as in Picture 2, Now using E00 go over the previous colour with circular movements of your marker so the 2 colours are blended then bring E00 further out into the face as in Picture 3
Durham, New Hampshire, USA
She often drops hints about the fact that she would quite like to go to Finishing School, but sadly, the parents that she chose are short of a few bob, and a few titles for that one....
The reason why I have been away so long, is health wise.
There is time to hear the kind words of friends and say to oneself,
shine on!
Okay, most of Scalphunter's adventures took place in the east, mostly New York & Washington D.C. and he hasn't heard of Metropolis!?!?! Proof positive that this is an alternate earth.
But the Holy Spirit also comes alongside us corporately and we turn to opening verses of Acts 13 to get a glimpse of this:
Luke Donald (World Number 1): “I feel very good about this course. Having a good short game is important here…what’s very magical about this tournament is usually Sunday is a great chance to make a run.”
Maybe we feel better about ourselves if we take the Little Hills in life first, but for a roller coaster to work; they take the Big Hills first, and then you coast the rest of the way through based on the momentum from the First Hill. Go ahead, say it! “Joe, you’re crazy; you want us to tackle the Big Hills in life First!?!” No; I want you to make up your own mind. I am making up my mind; and my way of thinking is to challenge myself to tackle the Big Hills in Life first, and build up a nice big head of steam and then after getting over the Big Hill, enjoy the ride! The Bigger the First Hill on the Rollercoaster at the Amusement Parks, the more people will stand in line to ride it. The Bigger the First Hill in Life; and fewer amounts of people who will line up to tackle it.
First time I have ever worn blues! Even though the look was super simple, I got tons of compliments from my co-workers and customers today =)
Jenkins’s use of the phrase “a conjuring trick with bones” may have caused outrage – and was, he said later, a misquotation – but his willingness to question a “literal” resurrection did not put him so far outside the Christian mainstream as is often suggested.
People in general? When someone holds a door open for you, or lets you go ahead of them in line at the grocery store, or basically does something that they didn't have to do but did because they are a semi-decent human being? Can you, at the very least, grunt some sort of thank you? Doesn't even have to be audible. Maybe a nod, with some eye contact. The fact that you don't acknowledge this tiny bit of kindness won't hinder me or most other people from continuing to do it, but damn. A "thank you" would be nice once in a while.
with Worsted weight yarn and G hook
I have started my Victim Support Counselling. I hope that in the 6 months they allow me my counsellor, that I can deal with as much as possible.
04. A Girl Called Johnny
I can’t believe I am sitting here realizing how much time I wasted on you
Now that the Thanksgiving leftovers have all been nestled snug in their Tupperware beds in the fridge, and as it begins to look a lot like Christmas, if you're casting about for a new movie to add to your list of holiday favorites, consider giving Remember the Night a try. There's still plenty of time to order your copy
It occurred to me that I haven't done one of those giant trade posts that everyone loves so much in quite awhile. It also occurred to me that I am on vacation this week. Why on earth have I not realized that vacation is the perfect time for a giant trade post?
Rounds 15 – 20: Repeat round 14, always join as above. (You should now have eight dc rows)
In extreme cases, untreated, exceptionally high blood sugar can cause still births.
Before I developed a deep and loving relationship with Christ Jesus, I would have scoffed at the notion of considering it pure joy when I faced trials. I used to run screaming from trials. I spent a great deal of time burying myself in self-deprecating behavior, trying desperately to cover up the pain or frustration with something (seemingly) tangible. I would mask the ‘problem’. But the mask is always lifted and the problem still exists…unless you are in tight communion with the Lord Jesus.
Obviously Jean Paul Gaultier has created more looks for Kylie than these, and their friendship and collaboration goes back as far as to 1991 when he created the costumes for her Let's Get To It tour.
We initially did these courses on site (which we still do) and are now providing them in cities across the US. The response has been tremendous. People seem to really enjoy this course and have a lot of fun learning through the hands-on activities.
Starfish earrings-Charming Charlie's
Yesterday D and I went over to my sister’s place for Christmas dinner. My major preoccupation is to do whatever it takes so I don’t have any stomach or bathroom issues. And make sure I’m alert enough to take part in conversation and to be sociable.
While everyone around me seems to run for cover,
For the longest time Daughter #1 and I have had issues about who is actually accomplishing more work. Of course I am, because I am always doing 3 things at once even if she can’t see it; like prepping dinner, doing school planning and progressively cleaning the house, all while making sure everyone has their school work and is accomplishing something. She on the other hand will rush through her work, get stuck in a good book and get nowhere from there. So last night I made an agreement with her that I would only do things immediately related to that day’s school work, billing for the business, and Bible study during school hours on my computer, or until everyone is asleep. In return she has to not read anything other than school related material until I tell her it is a good time. I don’t know when that might be as of yet, but if she cooperates and we get a lot done during the day, she might have all afternoon. We will see how this goes, and if she can hold to her end of the agreement.
The exam yesterday morning… I’m pretty sure I passed it. The first question was a bit of a disaster and I didn’t write nearly enough, but the second one was on something that I spent a good two days researching and writing about a few months ago – it was one of those ideas that popped up and was too interesting not to explore. Voluntary hard work has its rewards!
If Goldstein continues meaningful work on the issues DDDB and he have highlighted, such as reform of eminent domain and land use processes, he will write his own legacy.
This is keep cat
Celebrating milestones on my road to better health today! My doctor was very pleased and so was I! In late September I had a blood sugar spike of 507 that scared the hell out of me, I seriously thought I was dying that night. This was a wake up call for sure. Had all sorts of tests, including a stress test. Thankfully my heart passed with flying colors. I have been watching my diet since then. My doctor did put me on a low dose of medication for both high cholesterol and diabetes, but I know the diet and exercise have really been a big part of the improvement. He told me he was very pleased with the progress because I was doing this on my own. So here are the numbers and why I am celebrating:
I will end here as starting work earlier today , as we have been allowed to start an hour earlier and then of course finish an hour earlier , great news on a Friday !
I don't carry a gun to work, really! But our workplace is focused on supporting Veterans and those who care about them. So we get to go to some neat events, one recently taking place in San Antonio, Texas, at the Army Strong Zone. I love it when we get to attend military-focused activities.
With the exception of the decrease in the Rydex Precious Metals fund assets, there is little to warrant our real interest in gold (for chart see last week’s Sentiment Overview). For now the market seems mired in cross currents that will probably leave it chopping within a range or declining mildly. The various sentiment surveys are not providing an edge with the consensus being mildly bearish.
Happy Weekend Everyone. xox J
I still don't think I have a problem. What I have now is a realization that I can't be cavalier about my sodium intake, just because I think I don't have a problem. That stuff adds up!
Ferguson has continued to talk positively about Pogba in an attempt to retain him at the club and Raiola added: “I think Paul’s very positive about Ferguson too. It’s a very difficult decision. He will make it next week.”
Your love is the most real thing to me, more real than anything in this life. I was made for worship, so for as long as I live I will praise Your name. I will reach out my hands to You. Just like I am satisfied by my very favorite treat chocolate & peanut butter ice cream… I am satisfied by You. I worship You Papa.
Finally, I had a midterm today. It wasn’t terrible, but there were a few questions that were out of left field and I know left a large portion of the class in the lurch. I think I did just fine, judging by what the others said. I’m not that worried. Tonight we’re going to Banpo Bridge to watch the light and water show and then tomorrow…LADY GAGA.
Lovely ornament - great idea!
I remember my English teacher at school being very fed up with my tutor group because we liked the “wrong” characters in our set books – Hal rather than Hotspur in Henry lV Part One and Edmund in preference to Edgar in King Lear, for example.
“The ferryboats all along the river from South Ferry to Hunter’s Point gave up the attempt to run on scheduled time,” the article continued. “Even when it was possible for the boats to make passage, not only tedious delay but absolute peril was to be apprehended. The constant collisions with heavy, thick cakes of ice detached from the floe threatened the rudder, paddle wheels and hull itself. More than once the fearful crash and shock, causing a sudden stoppage, conveyed the impression to terrified passengers that a hole had been knocked in the bottom of the boat.”
I think the danger we face as believers in the risen Messiah is that, like those other disciples, we forget the promises of Jesus, or we think he is not close, not next to us. And so, in the meantime, we try to just go on and get some kind of life and hope for ourselves.
My Saturday started early.
Oh, and get rid of the concrete because ew.
One approach is to bury his head in the sand and deny reality, which is what the U.N. Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) has decided to do. In its latest report, issued on March 28, the IPCC has largely abandoned talk of global warming mitigation and shifted instead to what is termed "disaster risk reduction." That is to say, reductions in greenhouse gases are not really going to affect temperatures, as the IPCC claimed in 2007, but with a wink and a nod we're going to assume that rising temperatures, which have actually been falling since 2002, are responsible for every severe storm in the next few decades. And since the IPCC is determined to remain in business and continue attempting to control the affairs of national economies around the world, we're going to focus on risk mitigation.
And who would have thought that my wool stash would be starting to rival my endless pile of fabric! Six months ago I wouldn't have even know what a skein was (the wool in the piccie above) let alone known how to roll it into balls. Loving all this new learning!
The burly veteran, who played defensive end on the College of San Mateo football team before joining the military, would sometimes wake up in the middle of the night at home in San Bruno and grab his girlfriend, putting both hands around her neck.
Elouisa Elphinstone
I have like 10 billion recipes from months ago just patiently waiting for me to post them. So stay tuned!
one would be Orkid Ria restaurant, which serves the best seafood in Langkawi (there's not a lot choice but don't compare it with the best in KL).
Do we even need full mesh Tiny avatars? Spheres are real easy to dress. :X But I will grant, that the new sculpty heads are really nice. Somebody will no doubt make a Tiny mesh avatar. But I don’t see “old style” Tinies going out of fashion any time soon. My only wonder is, can the avatar be squished so that the upper arms/forearms/hands overlap, all the torso pieces overlap, and the upper/lower legs overlap. If that could be arranged, then the Tiny wouldn’t have to be folded up with limbs at 180 degrees to normal. Then we could probably stop unfolding with all those Biggie animations.
When I got home, he looked weak. Mrs. Z said he’d actually improved significantly since she’d found him under the desk. But when I asked him if he wanted to go on a big boy ride, although his ears perked up, he couldn’t hold his head up. He couldn’t stand. Mrs. ZZUB told the girls that I was taking him to the doctor and we didn’t know what she would tell us. They said goodbye to him. She kept them in their room while I carried him out to the car. His head flopped backwards as I carried him and when I put him down to open the door, he collapsed again, peeing on himself.
This whole trip feels a little surreal at this point. The CREDO conference I attended far exceeded my expectations, and then my visit with my mother was totally unlike anything I could've foreseen. Before I left for the train today she let me take her to Starbucks--about a 6 block walk each way. I think the curbs made her nervous in her chair, but the neighborhood is pretty accessible and it went fine.
I grew up listening to stories about people like this. Men and women who possessed the qualities needed to meet the challenges of this rugged land. Men and women who experienced their share of laughter and tears while taming the Southwest . . . and learning something about themselves and their relationship with God along the way. These are the kind of men and women who inspire the books I write.
I watch,
Another evening tending bar at the safari guesthouse, and I witness our guests discussing the thorny topic of how lesbians should procreate. The women favour the use of sperm banks and mechanical squirting devices, but the men reject this method as unreliable and mean-spirited. The broody lesbian, they argue, should interview potential fathers face-to-face and allow the successful candidate to impregnate her, not necessarily face-to-face.
The plan was to get to Hurstville and just find somewhere, anywhere, the first place we saw, to eat as noon was getting a little late for breakfast.
What’s needed at these times is to slow down. While I can’t stop my self from making my quick judgment of the situation, what I can do is to delay announcing it. If pressed, I can state my ideas as tentative; as beginnings of thought, rather than as conclusions. I can include the doubt as part of what I know.
Assorted cosmetics and tools (Photo credit: Wikipedia)
If you are interested send me an e-mail: ewamariasz (at) gmail.com
which God prepared beforehand that we should walk in them. (Eph. 2:8-10).
His stomach was SO upset (a side effect of Reserpine) and he was really crampy as well. I don't know if we will continue with the reserpine after this dose because of how bad the side effects were, but we will see.
Anyhoo, I'm here with a very simple card for this week's CRAFTY CATZ WEEKLY CHALLENGE who have the superb theme of April Showers Bring Forth May Flowers, and, oh sister, have we had some April Showers! The garden has gone rampant with all the rain, and the grass is threatening to take over the world but it is still too wet to cut. Never mind, good for the wildlife.
“Are you dumb?!” Dominique spat. She rushed over to me, and attempted to swing at me again, but I ducked and punched her in the face. She fell to the floor then grabbed my legs, and I dropped beside her. She grabbed my hair, and I kicked her stomach repeatedly. I kept kicking till the bitch let go. Blood started spilling out of her mouth.
Gladstone had lost his seat in South West Lancashire in the election of 1868 despite a hard fought battle, due to opposition to his support for Irish Catholics and, apparently without asking his permission, Greenwich Liberals had listed him for their constituency in the same election. Interestingly Gladstone is reported as wearing the colour blue when fighting the seat, often seen as a colour for the Liberals in those days (Conservatives often used the colour red at the time). He won the seat and held it until 1880, defending it successfully in the 1874 general election, after which Gladstone went north to represent Midlothian. It was quite usual in the 19th century for politicians to hop about from one constituency to another or indeed to fight two seats at once.
speak to Ms. Madueke at the prompting of now
And it was. We had no chores and nowhere to be. We wandered around, got the DVD, had the milkshake, visited Gran and Pops, and went home. He was thrilled that I'd got all my work done and wouldn't need to spend any time on the phone or the computer. As was I.
Once you have a nice and moist dough, you need to start kneading it. With all the moisture, the dough will quite sticky and difficult to handle so just dust your work surface with some more flour to make it all a bit easier. Kneading develops the structure of the dough and involves pulling it apart with fingers, as well as rolling, pushing and folding it over and over for about five minutes.
Livermore Lab was founded to develop the hydrogen bomb, and new weapons of mass destruction are still designed there. For more than 25 years, people of faith and others concerned about the proliferation of nuclear weapons have gathered on Good Friday outside the Livermore Laboratory. This year Good Friday and Earth Day coincided.
You KNOW you don’t need these. It’s not healthy. Why are you doing this?
But, mostly, what I wanted to say is, thank you.
Barack Obama has declared his unequivocal support for same-sex marriage, taking a bold political gamble on an issue that divides American voters just months before a presidential election.
the question of whether or not ‘writer’s block’ truly exists. My answer, of course it does. Sometimes it’s simply because an author can take a story into so many directions and their perplexed on which road to take. Sometimes you can take the road less traveled and hit a dead end and your creativity hits the forsaken spot at the same time. What do I do when that happens? I doodle. Draw. Diagram. Then finally back away and wait (and pray) it’ll come to me. I’d read somewhere that someone described writers block as simply ‘fear.’ The author is afraid to take the story in the direction it needs. I can see that explanation as having merit, because I have felt that before. The most wonderful moment, though, is when I break down that wall of fear and trudge through the rubble
Never one to not use a cliche . . . I'M BAAAAAAAACK! I've dealt with Dad's passing last December, I've finished the three month office job, and I've gotten through the Slidell Antique Street Fair. Now I can devote myself full-time to my costume jewelry business--I've gone from two display cases in a corner of Antiques & Art On First in Slidell to an entire ROOM for me to show off (and hopefully sell) some really, really excellent stuff. I've found several wonderful eBay sellers who have helped me drastically increase the quality of my inventory and have also acquired several collectors, which is wonderful.
The predominate indicator is the fact that the son (Don) handed in two firearms at the police station when he went to report the matter. Reports mention that he found the two firearms at the farm-gate when he ran out of the homestead to get the bakkie, which he then drove to the police station. The two firearms were apparently a .357 Magnum revolver and a .22 rifle. (No criminal in his right mind will leave two firearms on the scene of a murder!)
Latner:
cycled here on their recumbent tricycles. In fact, they not only came here, they’ve travelled across the South, flying from Oregon to Houston on Feb. 25, 2012, and from there, cycling across Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, and Georgia, and just recently arriving in Charleston. At nights, they camp out or occasionally stay in motels, as they chose to do in Charleston. There they left their camping gear so they could more easily “tricycle” around the region.
Coun Warters, who has been quizzing officers about the authority’s legal liability with such accidents, said he had now received an email from David Walker, head of financial procedures, telling him the views of an official at the council’s insurers Zurich Municipal. The official said he could not offer legal advice, but it seemed to him that as the Highways Authority, the council would be deemed responsible if an “obstruction was caused emanating from the verge”. He said: “At common law and under statute, you will, in my view, struggle to defend as you are fully aware of this issue and the potential for serious injury or death.” So why would the council be willing to risk this, rather than off laying that risk to where it belongs, the owner?
Grandma Mickie must have a secret magical power of foretelling the future. Or she knows the chaos that is our house a little too well! A package showed up the Thursday before Halloween, and the boys were beyond excited to find new jammies among the candy & treats. Owen immediately started pulling his shirt trying to get it off to wear his new jammies and the older boys raced to see who could get their new favorites on fastest.
Add 1 teaspoon of spoon of sugar to lukewarm (baby bottle warm) water in a cereal bowl or other small bowl. Sprinkle the yeast on top of the sugar water and stir to dissolve the yeast. Let it sit undisturbed in a warm place free of drafts until it is doubled, about 10 to 15 minutes.
Step Up for Israel Egghead: ‘Israeli strike won’t stop Iranian bomb BWAHAHAHAHA!’ Overnight music video Disgusting: Turkish cosmetics company uses Hitler in commercial Terrorists Released in Shalit Deal Realize That Mahmoud Abbas Is A Liar Beinart ostracized? Rocket fired from Gaza hits Israel on Wednesday evening. Please share. Dorit Beinish: The gift that keeps on giving to the Left France’s anti-Jewish soul created Mohamed Merah
What is Rakeback?
'Describe how to determine the height of a skyscraper using a Barometer ?'
I honestly feel that so many women out there miss their one chance to be with their true Prince Charming because they let him go because he doesn’t have what society deems as the qualities for a perfect man. Society seems to place in our heads that we need to look for a guy who has a well paying job (ideally a CEO of a big name company), he has to be drop dead handsome (according to movie standards), buy you flowers everyday, spoil you with extravagant gifts and an array of other requirements. It seems that the man has to jump through hoops before we can even consider a future with him.
Don't make assumptions
So, it is now the case that bouncing the ball in frustration is a more heinous case of dissent then stating that the referee has the same properties as female genetalia at time of intercourse.
Two weeks ago he wanted to meet again – we hadn’t seen each other for a couple of months by then. He apologised for hurting me and regretted what had happened – he was very sorry for leaving me behind. There were clearly feelings left – he still loved me, he said! But he also loved the Other Girl and couldn’t choose and needed more time *sigh* So nothing had really changed, yet I still hoped that in the end it would work out – I simply could not get him off of my mind.
There hadn't been wildflowers on our walk to Eagle Lake, so I didn't feel so bad that day about not bringing my camera along. This day I left it in the car again ! and here, where we lost the trail that wandered over vast granite slabs, blooming pussypaws and purplish succulents were growing out of crevices, and red-orange pillows of moss made a splash in the shade of a downed tree. This picture is from another place and time, but I didn't want to leave anyone wondering what the flower looks like.
What kind of bird is it? Who cares! I’d color it Mulberry.
Chris: Of course I have a vagina. And you know I do.
2:05: The last boat successfully launched, Collapsible D, descends only a few feet before reaching the ocean. By now the water has reached the Promenade Deck and the forecastle is underwater, which quickens the pace of the sinking.
Forty-five minutes?!?! It felt like ten years.
A card for my then boyfriend (now husband) for our 13 month anniversary. He really likes Halloween and I was glad that lucky number 13 happened to be October. He loved the card. I was just starting to get to know my new Cricut so I was quite happy with how it came out.
Neither is love the physical attraction of one person to another that leads to anxiety about long-term security in the relationship. Love is not controlling a mate, it is not pitying or worrying about family or friends, it is not professional success, it is not possessions.
June 1st is quickly approaching isn't it?
We love this annual tradition. He keeps our girls in their places over the holidays. Fritz made his appearance this morning. Now, I just need to remember to move him in a new spot every night! If only we could find a similar helper that stayed the entire year and not just during the Christmas holidays. ;)
Dress (Kitchen Orange, consignment), tights (Le Chateau), boots (Miz Mooz), snake ring (vintage 80s), ring (Wendy Brandes).
I'm having a terrific stamping day today, and I didn't even stamp yet. It's nearly 11pm here, though, so squeezing in a little stampin' time before the clock strikes twelve is unlikely. Here's what made the day so great...
This is kind of like Communism; it sounds really, really good on paper.
Ergonomic handles
BETTY WHITE / Elka Ostrovsky – “HOT IN CLEVELAND” (TV Land)
50gms/2 ounces flour
November 3. Our Families. We have been blessed with amazing, godly parents and siblings. They are a constant example and support to us. No matter what we are facing, they're here and wanting to walk with us. What a blessing!
There is so much energy and fun to be found on “Liberty Bell.” After kicking off with the previously mentioned “Are You Ready?”, the album continues with “The Devil’s in the Details,” a pure dance track complete with banjo that recalls Rednex’s version of “Cotton Eye Joe.”
So frustrating to be such a pansy.
Gladys smiled as she eased onto Coronado Island. All of that because she never crosses a bridge that she because doesn’t look to see if there is water underneath.
Hi there Everyone! I'm so sorry I've been missing these last few days. It was a busy long weekend here. On top of the Easter holiday, it was also Travis's last weekend at home before starting his new job, and we were tackling a couple big projects that need to get done before we list the house. It was BUSY! In between the projects we tried to carve out as much family time as possible, which meant a couple of movie nights, plus a whole morning off of work, for Easter.
My contributions for St. Patty's Day 2010: Pictures of the beautiful, Irish lassie, Deborah Ann Woll, who plays the teenage vampire Jessica Hamby on HBO's True Blood. And, accolades for the beautiful Irish Ale produced by my hometown brewery, Boulevard Brewing.
Working in a cubicle environment has been one of the most challenging experiences of my career. When you’ve had your own office for 20 years, it’s hard to go back to working in a tight 4×5 space.
As well as meeting members of the London Salon, I was able to meet some of the other medal winners, whose images I regularly see in exhibitions but who I rarely get to meet in person. So here are some of the other medal winning images of photographers I met at the presentation, which the authors have kindly given me permission to show.
I had to stop myself. So many gathered and I will have to choose one. These are presented with no Photoshopping. Only cropping and adjusting the brightness to highlight the image. So what might Monet have done with these:
Tim Hardin How can we hang on to a dream US
Portland Cheers to Belgian Beers is one of the signature events by Oregon's breweries every year and about the only complaint I have is that the celebration is but one short day long. It's far too little time to try all the beers--unless your stamina and liver are sturdier than mine. The conceit of this annual gathering is simplicity at its finest: everyone brews a beer with the sme yeast. They are brewed to different strengths and styles, and festgoers vote on their fave. The winning brewer(s) take a victory lap, bask in the admiration of their peers, and select the yeast everyone will use the next year.
Please note the holy ones receive the kingdom “under all the heavens.” If I could borrow your expression, when talking about the “seat” that the holy ones will sit on, it seems clear to me that it will be “under all the heavens.”
When the old
Applying this interpretation to the teachings of the reference, the Board found that:
Try to mix carefully .Cook for 2 minutes more
“Clare Services has undergone a radical change in how we provide support to people with intellectual disability. Our focus has been the transformation of our service from one which supported people in segregated group settings to one where individuals are supported to access opportunities, services and supports which enable each individual to live a ‘real life in a real place.’”
Happy Monday, everyone! Have a great day!
Having spent most of today curled up with Vince, I really wanted to have a play for the first time in days (that's got to be a good sign, right?) so I had a scout round the challenges and found these
COLES FB, BALZANO GJ, MORSE DL. An outbreak of influenza A (H3N2) in a well immunized nursing home population. J Am Geriatr Soc 1992; 40: 589-592.
"Can the eurozone survive in its present form? Not if its members carry on the way they have over the past year. Hoping that something will turn up won’t do. If we have learnt anything from the economic crisis for the past three years, it’s that if you have a problem, you need to fix it now."
Please join me again. Grace in All and All in Grace: Avishaan
Just remember how much vulnerability there is in falling, you know? There's fear alongside the exhilaration. Don't topple into the strong-character trap - the trap of the girl who's always funny and witty and snappy and knows just what to do. Real people are not like that. Especially not when faced with the possibility of rejection. And God knows real teenagers are not like that.
yes, the A & P
Growing up, I always loved when my mom made this perogie stir-fry. I thought perogies were the best. I loved them so much that when a stray cat appeared in our garage one day, I named it Perogie. He didn't stick around for long, but my love of perogies is still alive and kicking.
6.Bake for around 50 minutes or until the cake is golden and a skewer inserted in the centre comes out clean. Check the cake half way through, and cover lightly with foil if it's browning too quickly.
These latter years he spends all of his time, winter and summer, when the weather is dry, under a giant chinaberry tree in front of his house.
water, milk, or heavy cream
They said there'd been a robbery,
1/3 c almond meal
- bow (optional)
Daniel Tosh says more offensive things literally every day. So does David Cross. Richard Pryor did too. So in a lot of ways the platform makes all the difference. If I call myself a comedian I can get away with a lot more than I can if I call myself a columnist. Just look at Jon Stewart, right?
They swore, if we gave them our weapons, that the wars of the tribes would
Sometimes there is not much time at all between seed- time and harvest. Just because we do not immediately see the answer, does not mean that the Jesus has not heard or answered our prayers. Today, we can receive answers just like the people in the Bible. We simply must know the Bible well enough to know His will and His word, and we must ask wholeheartedly in faith,
who together built up the house of Israel.
I consider myself extremely fortunate to be designing for both of these amazing companies, and then throw in the whimsical and fun designs of Samantha Walker, and my happiness is magnified.
- The irony was too rich when Morgan started talking about how his creative freedom were being limited from working with a client. It is unfortunate he never made the connection between his own internal struggle with the creatives who work in the industry every day. It would have made for a poignant 10 minutes if he sat down with a creative to discuss how to handle these limitations.
Good readers always make predictions as they read about what they think will happen next. Predictions are not just grabbed from the air but are based on what they know about story, clues from the book itself, and what they know about the genre they’re reading. At the end of each chapter, write a prediction based on the evidence. Use page numbers to support your predictions. Remember: predictions are often wrong! Readers love to be wrong!
Also in the works at GIT is Madame Tussaud, a six-hour miniseries about the famous artist and business woman who survived the French Revolution. Michael Hirst (The Tudors) will executive-produce with Alan Gasmer and Sherry Marsh.
The issue came to light when dog owners across Andalucia, Murcia and Alicante found their pets drinking more than usual and were later diagnosed with kidney problems.
“The first quarter saw the largest quarterly inflow ever for Canadian ETPs, and that parallels the global situation,” Nedovich says. “Assets are at a record high and there is still amazing potential for growth.”
listen to our daughter practicing, going over and over
Dear housewives,
This city and our hotel are going to make this week enjoyable. It is beautiful here and for those coming next, we are at The Garden and it is only $70/ day. It is actually cheaper then our 70s hotel in ZZ :-). Also we are loving the location. There are tons of shops and restaurants along the road.
I'll be offering them in a variety pack
I remember trying to explain to him that I wasn’t a “professor”, but I don’t think it sank in. That may have been due to the Hurricane he was sipping on.
It starts where we are standing
What struck me as odd, however, was the nearly complete absence of any mention of Jim working with any of China's orphanages. In fact, a reader of "The Pink Pagoda" would finish with the impression that nearly all of the unwanted children had been adopted inside China. This impression runs completely contrary to what Jim told me and others in his interviews, in which he proudly boasted of working with four internationally adopting orphanages in Chongqing, from which he claimed that 80% of the children adopted came as a result of his work, and with hundreds of other such orphanages across China. His website continues to encourage U.S. adoptive families to "ascertain if we have been part of the process of saving your babies in China." Although in his book he claims that his first "save" was in 2000 (which he also confirmed in other interviews, including mine), he recently responded to a family with children adopted in the late 1990s from Anhui and Jiangxi Provinces thusly: "To be quite frank our work encompassed so many of the children rescued in the late 90's and up until recent days that there is a real possibility that your daughters were handled by our folks." He continued to contradict previous interviews and his own book by stating: "We never placed any children in orphanages after 2000. All the babies from then on with only a few exceptions were adopted internally by barren Chinese couples." It seems that Jim's story constantly changes depending on whom he is addressing.
Then he looked at each line and broke out in a grin.
The importance of ammonium nitrate will likely prove a key operational difficulty for Muslims throughout our Muslim Troubles. Though access to it is not restricted per se, it is usually bought in bulk from agricultural suppliers who adhere voluntarily to a code of practice under which they report suspicious purchases or requests to the authorities. This code of practice did not prevent Bodle Brothers, an agricultural supplier in Burgess Hill, selling 600kg of it to an Algerian would-be terrorist in 2003, despite it being vastly too much for the allotment for which he claimed to need it. However, we assume that the powers-that-be have since applied a cattle prod to the nether regions of agricultural suppliers in general, and that said suppliers run a tighter ship now. Either way, a descent into violent conflict will necessarily result in far greater scrutiny of attempts to purchase such chemicals than exists at present, and being a Muslim will be the greatest red flag of all. The five men of Bangladeshi origin arrested taking photographs of Sellafield on the day Osama bin Laden was killed will no doubt attest to the way in which belonging to certain ethnic groups results in you being flagged for special attention fairly promptly. This suspicion will only heighten along with the violence we predict.
There were no distinguishing features save for the one wall covered with
G24
Holy buggering smeg, Batman.
I agreed with it deeply, people like us, no matter what the issue is, they will and always trust us..so i no need to explain more; people dislike us, no matter how persuasive or confidence of your statement was, they still cannot accept the fact, because the hate feeling is there, therefore, i do not need to explain more.
In LDS churches, most of us spend one hour with our with an age group, one hour with a gender group, and one hour seated by family with the whole group. We also have formal gender-based organizations and spend time with them occasionally in service or social activities.
Wayne has had a headache for 5 days, and he couldn't handle the pounding music any longer.
Two offers. A tough choice. And now the true madness begins: the preparations for moving.
Some time ago I mentioned on another blog that it must take some doing to just open a pub with 10 handpumps and a load of unusual beer on keg. We're averaging just short of 800 pints of cask a week, the thought of doing twice that terrifies me - the cellar isn't big enough as it is!
your being is a reminder
Last summer we tried an experiment. Instead of going to a Suzuki Institute or a local music camp, we packed up our violins, tin whistles, guitar, cello and ukulele, and headed to the mountains of North Carolina for a week of fiddling fun with Scott Walker and his family fiddle camp. I had no idea what to expect. I had never been to the camp before and I didn't know anyone who had gone. But I did know that what I wanted for my children was to experience some freedom and joy in music, and to kick back and relax with their strings.
Words without letters
When I was in high school I got straight A's, was in every club I could be in, played basketball, softball, was a cheerleader and on the dance team. I don't know how to commit to just one thing and perfect it. I always feel left out. It is a vicious cycle. Is it the artist brain? - one that triggers in so many directions but never truly commits?
Spreading their influence beyond Essex and all over the south of England “The Conflict Within” show no signs of stopping as they push their polished but filthy noise further North.
(12 marks)
What a craving of bliss
*Call BFF more often
Next week, I will be giving a “State of Our Schools” presentation to the community. This presentation will show the progress we have made as a district and the challenges we face as we work to improve our schools and support student achievement.
There are several potential advantages for producers who may consider a production contract. Such contracts may provide for a more stable income for the producer by reducing traditional marketing risks. Such contracts may allow a producer to benefit from technical advice, managerial expertise and access to technological advances provided by the contractor. An agricultural production contract may provide the producer with a guaranteed market, provided that the commodities are produced in accordance with the contract. Finally, such contracts may allow a producer to increase the volume of his business with limited capital since the contractor may often supply the necessary production inputs…
We want you to browse and be updated daily on the latest happenings in around South Africa, not only because we love you guys but rather because no-one likes to be left out of the loop.
The weather's warming and the Farmer's Market season will be starting up soon..yeah!
Several large russet or white potatoes
Me: Um, what about the rest of the London Broil in the fridge? We had bread and cheddar cheese and lettuce...There was grilled chicken in the freezer and salad in the fridge...
If you are by nature a weaver and synthesizer, your temperament may better suit you to seek inspiration from study and practice with a diversity of traditions. Seek to find the common heart and core around which they come together, and appreciate how each contributes to deepening your wisdom and love, and to strengthening your faith.
‘Things have changed a lot in the last ten years,’ she explains. ‘I think the 90s started with this feeling that we will overcome our problems and everything was gonna be amazing. But if you look at history, periods like that are very rare, so maybe this is more normal. I like to think it’s the end of the dinosaurs and the Texan tycoons and white trash Christianity maybe. I think you’ve never had so many people interested in politics as there is right now. If somebody like me is interested, it’s gotta mean that everybody is, right?
“Nothing,” Naida turned away and started walking.
﻿ Here is a picture of us shortly after he asked! Sorry for terrible picture i couldn't find the file on my computer :(
Fetching not a pale, you are no Jack
Your future
Since not all of you have been with me since day one and because I like to finally consolidate my learning system in a new updated format, I decided to dedicate a post directly to how I am learning Spanish as well as any other future languages. (For a summary of this you can click on my system page.)
On paper, this first verse has a similar structure and meter to the opening of Rising Sun Blues. If you listen to Lomax’s original recording and interview, however, you’ll find it has a completely different tune, not to mention different subject matter. Quite a song, though.
It is not uncommon, in life today, to know a family that has parents living in separate homes. Very sad really, but reality it is. My reality is not as common. I have three children (common), two different fathers ( less common), and am a single parent (more common) that refuses to give up on love (you say common, my mother says ridiculous and I say romantic).
An easy trip to Islington Bay.
“Mommy, tell me what happened to Michael Jackson again”
When commissioned Gillespie King and Coia, GKC intended to create a space of space of beauty and spiritual reflection relevant to the modern world, therefore they decided to use a cutting edge modernist design and materials. GKC had an obsession with light and wanted the space to reflect the otherworldly nature of religion. On the ground floor the large open plan area and glass windows were designed to give the trainee priest the sense of being out of the space whilst in it, highlighting the church’s connection with the outside world. In addition to this theme GKC aimed to make the link between the spiritual and the material as tenuous as possible. Therefore the concrete structures that echo the popular housing designs of the era attempted to subconsciously train the priests to be used to working in a ‘real world environment’. The building was divided into different sections aiming to give priests a sense of work and play. However the site was actually modelled on monastic designs so still held deep religious connotations whilst the striking design reflected the changing era.
a husband who is my best friend
I know the feeling. Trust me. haha
So now I’m working on figuring out how to do that all the time. Because every now and then I end up with random brain dumps that, while helpful, aren’t exactly fueling my fiction word count. Except they do by getting the other stuff out of the way. It’s amazing how full the brain can get just going about your daily business.
The depiction of shepherds in art and literature is central to the Art of the Pastoral
This weekend, I went away to visit my extended family members. It was pretty far, but definately worth it, after seeing the faces of my wonderful grand - parents! The city they live in, is fairly small, and most definately different from what I am use to, so a little adjusting is ovbiously necessary. Over all, it was a great weekend, well spent!
Specifically, these state-funded activists want to see...
Meet Koolhass by ZU. Similar to Nightwalk but in the end a bit cheaper and I can take them home right now instead of waiting for my Jeffrey Campbell store to get them in stock. They also have a squishy insole which means they should be super comfortable for long nights (or days) out. I think they are also a bit lighter then my Nightees which can be an upside when wearing them for a long time. Also love the little Mary Jane strap, it gives them a different look to my Nightee’s and I can wear them with tights (yay!).
~ the interplay of “magic” and “religion” as well as “science”
I guarantee you that you will not find another gown that shimmers like this. Mirette is stunning and elegant, and will make you the envy of all your friends.
Ten first-year law students from five law schools across Ontario have also been working hard to produce articles for the Ontario Women’s Justice Network. Their articles are to be featured on the website and provide crucial legal information and education to diverse women in Ontario. Thank you for your commitment to justice and best wishes on your final exams this month!
This often means facing aspects of the self or of life that have been painted over, or covered up to be forgotten. A powerful and ancient totem, it is the symbol of the Goddess, ferocity and valor. Panthers are solitary creatures and develop an inner knowing. They can be absolutely silent when stalking their prey: with a Panther totem, you will find your greatest power in silence and stealth, as you pursue your goals and aspirations." - fortunecity.com
I called my OB's office on Monday (I actually really like my OB's office a TON) but they were not super helpful and basically said go to your primary care doctor if this keeps up after a few days. I lasted till Tuesday and went to urgent care - is it bad that I don't even HAVE a primary care doctor? I need to get on that! (Along with finding a pediatrician for my baby that will be here in two weeks, but that's a whole other ballgame).
It's a bigger issue. It's easy enough to just say, stop eating sugar. If it were that simple, people would just do it. Sugar is addictive. Sadly, this is why many Americans are hypoglycemic and diabetic.
I believe my other half and I are perfect couple but we just are not in a perfect situation currently. We have been in a long distance relationship for more than 2 years and I have decided to go back for good to Malaysia after married. The Western Romance collection reminds me of all the love letters I sent him when we are physically apart. I even made our love album for memories, for things to smile at when we grow old together ;) I think the love to scrapbook came in because I always find everything around me just so precious. I love to keep sweet and happy memories and I love to own and keep beautiful things. And I always find things in white beautiful :)
Jennifer said... 1 OMG I am so excited about this one! My daughter does NOT eat crust. I have tried everything to get her to without luck. I am subscribed!
The fact is, neither party would dream of following ‘something for something’ to its logical conclusion. In civilised society it always comes with a caveat of unconditional support for the most vulnerable, but it seems neither party now wants to muddy their hard line on ‘scroungers’.
You’d want to hide your face behind a scary golden mask too, huh?
Well enjoy your weekend everyone whatever you are doing and come visit again soon.
May 16 Los Angeles, California - The Smell w/ Tinylittle
1/4 cup diced yellow onion
That's my son-in-law, John, Courtney, Christopher and their dad, Chris. They were truly AMAZING! The show was taped for future broadcast--I'll let you know if it will be available for download.
Talent is important and typically the focus of player development in youth sports. However, one aspect of team success that is frequently overlooked and sometimes undervalued is internal leadership. Teams and organizations usually spend their cognitive and financial resources on skill development, focusing the majority of their time and effort on tactical and technical growth. Recently, more and more organizations are recognizing the importance of team leadership and integrating leadership development into their athletic programs. A simple way to highlight and understand the significance of team leadership is to ask youth athletes to describe their experiences playing with both an effective team captain and an ineffective team captain. Youth athletes report that team leadership impacts their motivation levels, adherence to team rules and mission, commitment to team success, and overall performance.
Advocate ethnic solidarity instead of the treatment of pupils as individuals.
Originally I had everything lined with green card stock, but that ended up being way, way too much green. So I took the chance, and switched it to pink, not really knowing how well the green paper would look mounted on pink. I think it looks fabulous! The whole card is so girlie but yet the pinkness of it is toned down by the green :)
Happy Wednesday Crafty Friends! Welcome to another Sneaky Peek with My Creative Time and Emma's Design Team. For today's Project, I am showcasing the "You Are Perk-fect" Stamp Set. If you are Coffee Lovers like me, you will LOVE LOVE LOVE playing with the "You Are Perk-fect" Set! Emma really has a Crafty Love for all of us Crafters. She definately knows what works with our Crafty Projects. Let me start by showing you my Project for this Sneaky Peek.
When I first saw this recipe I really wondered how in the world a slow cooker lasagna would turn out. I didn't really have a lot of confidence in this recipe but I had seen this blogged before so I figured it had to be decent or people would not be blogging it. And it is more than decent. I loved it! I think I will definitely make this again in my slow cooker. It is just sooo good. I added a pound of ground beef and used a bit less sausage but that is just my preference. Also be certain to watch this closely when the cooking time is coming to an end. I cooked this for 6 hours and the edges do start to burn so be careful not to overcook this. Enjoy this with some salad and crusty bread! This recipe comes from Betty Crocker.
For those of you who value the scriptures above experience, do you not realize that the scriptures we born from experience? Those of you who value experience above the scriptures, do you not realize that the scriptures will bring you into a greater experience?
If establishment luminaries are in the least troubled by the fact that there is still no good solution to the problem of nuclear radioactive waste, they have not let on. Even if no earthquake or tsunami ever came near the nuclear reactors, the dangers of soil and groundwater contamination are serious enough. It is reasonable to add that human (and yes, computer) error is an eternal fact – it wasn’t an earthquake that caused the Chernobyl disaster. Seeing pictures of its after-effects 25 years later, it is clear one does not have to live through nuclear war to recognize the truth of a phrase attributed to Nikita Khrushchev, “the living will envy the dead”. A malfunction is enough.
- Calls from 'lost' friends
a granola bar, a protein bar, a piece of fruit (usually apple or plum), a whole wheat wrap w/chicken breast, spinach, pepper and humus
My Favorite Lasagna (page 137)
It has long been a question, ” What is the line between art and pornography?” I use to believe there was indeed a line between the two. Erotic art for instance, can go so far as to push the envelope of sexuality, while still remaining balanced on the other side of “Smut“. But as of late, I have been reconsidering.
1 reflection
Anyway, enough of my rant about this, I'll let Dave Atherton speak on behalf of smokers and anyone else denied their freedom of choice about their lifestyle choice as he is interviewed on radio.
I felt stunned and amazed by this event. Why would such a beautiful event take place here, where people never are, or it’s not like you have a reason to go there if you don’t know about it. Maybe it’s for a later patch or something? I hope so, so people get to see it, but still I kinda want it to be a secret. Cause I love these hidden, secret places people usually miss as they rush through quests and other things. I like to have more time and explore everything, every little corner of the map. But I still think there has to be more, or would they really do that much for a 3 min event in a place like that?
As You now touch mine
xxxxxxxxxxxxx
DR MAROON: While the Not So Smug Award goes to…
The Ron Paul supporters, known affectionately around here as Ronulans, are an interesting bunch. You’ll never meet people more committed to a candidate or case, you’ll also never meet people more delusional about their chances of winning. It is true Paul was able to fill a lot of college gyms for campaign events and it’s true that Paul’s passionate supporters will turn out in droves for every single internet poll. But that doesn’t translate into actual votes, something Paul’s largely young following doesn’t seem to understand. Unable to get more than 15% of the Republican vote, now the Ronulans believes he can out maneuver everyone and win the delegate count at the GOP Convention. It is the height of lunacy.
Lately I am never impressed with music videos, maybe because they are always about the same thing.
I think it is also easier to feel people are divine when you haven’t built a large database in your head about their ‘humanity’ – their intentions, their frailities and so on.
Or perhaps, a “How Not To Write” themed blog would work in your favor?
how they rest now as one
Quite interested in conversations about knee and hip replacements - Murray.
CNSNews.com is not funded by the government like NPR.
The LFG hubby and I celebrated a double digit anniversary in high style: an early walk-about at my favorite art galleries downtown, a dinner at trusty go-to restaurant Club Paris (a great little dive, and a great filet mignon), and attendance at the University of Alaska Anchorage men’s hockey game.
I used my Corner Chomper to round the corners of the covered TP Roll.
I want to be oblivious to the complexities of life
The article on William Morris intrigued me, as I have a long time interest in his life, art and ideals, and I am always interested to see how he is reinterpreted and represented for the present. I do think he continues to be relevant, particularly as many people now seem willing to listen to what used to appear to be fanciful and radical notions of ownership and lifestyle.
My sweet children bought me a piece of the soap I love so much, aleppo soap. Since I got a bit older, I wouldn't want to use any other soap.
What do you think children of today want to read?
But long before that, Mugabe attacked the trade unions, which was of less interest to the white, Western and capitalist press.
Answer: What is ___________________?
Amit Bansal answers, It’s a good idea to collect some positive feedback documented over emails or in the form of certifications your company may have given you during the time of your service. Present them during the interview or attach them as references when you submit your details to the HR of the new organization. I guess then it wouldn’t matter if verbally they don’t have anything good to say about you.
MSU Bikes is dedicated to promoting bicycling as a safe, fun, economical, efficient, environmentally friendly and healthy transportation alternative for the MSU campus community.
But, really? It was mostly me, going... Mmmmm.... Oreo cake.
especially when she's not a fan of pepper and sees her man adding salt and pepper to said tomatoes a moment later. (See, trust is a key to a happy marriage, too.)
That will not die
some, that is impossible. So, maybe I am no better and they are no
From the People’s Daily Online
We also love sugarcane juice just as much as the next guy.
The phrase "book-length" is in the title on the cover and I've always wanted to say that this cover was by Gene Colan but I never have and probably never will. Inside is a 25 page lead feature "7 Dead Men", penciled by, yup... Gene Colan! I'm going to devote an entire blog post or two in the future to Gene Colan's Timely and Atlas work so I'll just mention that Gene does a fantastic job this early in his career. The story was penciled at the age of 21 and by my unofficial tally this is approximately the 12th Timely story Gene worked on. As seen below, Gene is already one of the better artists on the Timely staff. The author is unknown, the inker is unknown and it's possible there may even be other hands helping out as Timely staff work was sometimes done piecemeal. Here are a couple of pages:
Jason said Mr D pointed out some of the flaws in the building finish and wasn't a fan of a large concrete post that was used as an architectural feature in the restaurant.
Alas, The Great Debate. My previous post about trends, sneaker wedge edition was not a Great Debate because there’s no question. I love the sneaker wedge and I’m proud to say it. The neon trend, however, I am not fully on board with. There is a thin line between chicness and tackiness when it comes to neon.
The new feature will make it easier to prevent malware on the host computer. Google also fixed twenty vulnerabilities, this includes eight dangerous glitches that would allow a hacker to gain access to the system.
FATHER’s DAY is a searingly honest account about what it’s like to be the parent of a special-needs child, a story that doesn’t gloss over the disappointments – however petty – that go along with knowing that the trajectory of achievement you’d mapped out and hoped for is going to end not with a college degree and a shiny future but a job in a grocery store where Zach learns, with the help of a job coach, that eggs need to be bagged separately.
Angry, I texted back ‘If that’s how you feel there won’t be another time. I’ll be out of your hair to make it all less complicated’.
with no time left to find a better place to hide
Kombucha culture has a wide range of organic acids, probiotics, acids and
What I'm saying is, if this is who you are, and this connection is important to you, beware not to drive it away with attachment to the trappings that society sets down as the norm. So when it does show up embrace it but don't attach to it. Let it evolve and let it be what it is. Enjoy its magic and revel in it. Don't make demands on it and it will evolve always into what it's supposed to be for exactly as long as it's supposed to. I think that this applies to every other relationship in your life. To your children, your parents, your friends without the burden of expectation. It changes how you deal with people and how they relate to you and for the better.
Fran Sandridge, 69, works at the National Library of Medicine in Bethesda. She said she enjoyed the class but was sometimes overwhelmed by the amount of information.
and here we are, singing along, word-for-word to a preschool rock band.
The crisis has forced me, and many others, to scramble for our dictionaries and secondary school textbooks in the hope of finding some solace in the proclamations of the newscasters who report on the amount of radioactive material pouring into our atmosphere. Of course knowing not to trust the news too much is as important as having a good coat in your possession at all times in Ireland. With that in mind it doesn’t help to not have a clue what they are talking about and not to have an idea of the stipulations of their proclamations. The biggest problem with scrambling for school books and dictionaries is that they probably don’t have the answers needed to help you rest at ease.
My new phone has a very decent camera on it unlike my old phone which was so awkward to use that by the time I’d sorted out what I was supposed to do to get it on the screen, the moment had passed.
2 teaspoons powdered bread crumbs
The phrase actually originated with Francois Guizot (1787-1874) a French monarchist statesman under Louis Philippe:
That grows on fields where valor led,
Glass surfaces without dust
Transformed by a madman's curse, Jesse Sikes is a killing machine. Twenty years ago he cut a bloody swath through the small town of Gideon - until his mother struck him down with her own occult powers. Now Eleanor Sikes is dying. The bonds that hold the monster are weakening.
Actually, though the fall was pretty bad and I did need a few weeks to heal, I am actually taking the opportunity to rest a different pain. I have been dealing with plantar fasciitis since last year. It has been nagging for quite some time, but it has started to get a bit worse recently. This month off has been good for it. I am still experiencing discomfort, but the majority of pain has definitely eased up. I definitely want to explore this some more since I have been either completely barefoot or wearing cheap, thin flip flops when shoes have been necessary. I think I am wearing “too much” running shoe.
McLaren goes on to discuss religious violence in the post 9/11 era and violent language by Muslims, Israelis and U.S. Televangelists. “A lot is at stake,” he tells us. I (and I suppose Pete) would agree. However, it seems to me that the implication is that our interpretation of Scripture should somehow be a reaction to others’ misinterpretation.
Day 8 started today, and I woke up with pink eye and feeling quite low on energy. Headache, mild chills, sore throat. The last three I could deal with, but pink eye is supposed to be wildly contagious.
your scrapping "system"... What program do you use? Where do you start first - photos, papers, elements, journaling? Do you always have something in mind when you start, or do you let your creativity guide you? How long does it take you to complete a
Hey y'all! My name is Kate and I am so excited to be sharing with you all today here at Random Thoughts of a Supermom!
CREATIVE INSPIRATION:
The Government and Council have totally buggered up their preparation for this kind of weather, but don't let them turn you against the snow people!
Then I made some buttons! I just love them! I cut out a bunch of little circles, glued 5 layers together and punched out some small circles with my eyelet tool. Then smothered them in glossy accents and left them to dry!
Questions?? Be do not hesitate to ask!
At least 17 people were also wounded in the blasts, most of which were children on their way to school, according to the Interior Ministry.
Spittle Bond
She said McClain gave her a gun and demanded she shoot either him or the boyfriend.
Put lamb shank in pressure cooker. Pour in water to cover around 3/4 of the shank. Throw in all the ingredients. Close the pressure cooker lid tightly and engage the safety lock. Cook the shank at high heat for 10 minutes then turn heat to low and cook for another 15 minutes. Let the cooker cool down for around 20 minutes and then release the pressure slowly. Serve lamb shank while still hot!
A quick google search showed that in Japan any photos, this goes for video as well, that show people in a public space that are published the photographer ’may’ be infringing on the privacy rights of people in the photograph, if the photos are published in Japan.
With that particular book, the story came first. But pictures are very important to me – my plot plans are often cartoon diagrams and I was the only lecturer who used to teach ‘post-structuralism’ with the help of a handy chart!
You are special, my dear sweet beloved
The sea, liquid pewter, rises to receive.
The two shootings were unrelated.
Alright, no one has to harass me by e-mail any more…I have finally found time to put together my newest Summer 2012 Fitness Program. Fear the bathing suit aisle no more, I’ve come with ammo to destroy those pesky and hurtful body-image issues with some basic facts.
The Board essentially approached the question of whether or not emails represent a public disclosure on the basis of whether or not the information in the email would be considered to be confidential. Confidentiality could either be determined by (i) whether the sender intended for the email to be confidential, or by (ii) whether an intercepted email could be lawfully disclosed to the public. The Board decided to reject looking at the sender’s intention since this would introduce a subjective criterion which G1/92 sought to avoid. Thus the Board instead looked at whether the contents of an intercepted email could be lawfully disclosed. It took the view that in Europe and the US the contents of an intercepted email could not be lawfully disclosed and therefore emails must be considered confidential. It was acknowledged that in other territories that might not be the position, but to avoid the need to have any subjective criteria, the Board decided that emails in any territory would not be considered public.
Okay, so it's the holiday season and I should be charitable to the creators of this monthly dreck these "artists" try to pass off as movie poster art....
Let us examine the weak points of mental slavery again. The main one is that, once freed, the mind cannot be enslaved anew. But a free mind can also turn strengths into weaknesses. The fact that mind chains are invisible makes them strong as long as they are not perceived as such. Once removed, however, their invisibility becomes a weakness, because NOBODY CAN TELL IF YOU’RE WEARING THEM OR NOT.
The Career & Technical Education graduates 58% of its participating students.
CIA. She served as an Executive Assistant to Jesuit-trained Knight of
Rev. Nathan Nettleton is an ordained minister with the Baptist Union of Victoria and has been pastor to the congregation in South Yarra since 1994. He has been engaged in dialogue on the place of homosexual people in the churches since his involvement on the Baptist Union’s 1997 Taskforce on the topic. He lives in Melbourne with his wife and their 13 year old daughter and two dogs.
the kids LOVED it and begged me to make it again......
Since the Rothschilds took over the Bank of England around 1815, they have been expanding their banking control over all the countries of the world. Their method has been to get a country’s corrupt politicians to accept massive loans, which they can never repay, and thus go into debt to the Rothschild banking powers. If a leader refuses to accept the loan, he is oftentimes either ousted or assassinated. And if that fails, invasions can follow, and a Rothschild usury-based bank is established.
Well, Heisenberg countered that when particle A and B interact in the beginning, they become "Quantum Entangled"--one Wave Function that describes both particles. When the Wave Function collapses (from measuring one particle only) it collapses the entire function...everywhere...instantaneously. This is, if you pardon the expression, fucking weird as hell.
I love summer as you know, and one of the very best things is opportunity to pick fruit and vegetables straight from the garden.
Again and again I was impressed by the focus and professionalism of these groups. When a cell phone rang (endlessly) as the first pitch was blown, the students of Forte did not bat an eye. When a PFC member’s hair got stuck to her face, she never once touched it. It was clear that these students had carefully thought through the smallest details of their performance, resulting in polished performances from the moment they set foot on the stage.
Back at the Blackie house, a DVD is put into the machine and the whole family gathers round to watch a documentary made in the 1970s about this intriguing sect of Argentine society. Schlebusch points at the TV: "Those are my brothers," she says in Afrikaans, gesturing to three men seated on a bench. "The one in the middle is dead. The other two still work on the farm, but they struggle a lot." At one time there were several families living on their sheep farm -- about 30 to 40 people in total, Schlebusch says -- but now her brothers are the only ones left.
“Yes, I do! Have you found her? Is there a young man with her? Is he ok?”
But WAIT. Wow...gourmet packages are offered too. Gourmet cheeses, pates, jams, crackers are offered up in expensive but heartfelt style..with Deepest Sympathy...
Albedo is just the reflectiveness of an object. Earth's average albedo is 36%, which means it reflects 36% of the incoming sunlight out to space, while 64% is absorbed and actually goes into heating the planet. Using only the equilibrium temperature, we'd expect Earth's average temperature to be -18 degrees Celsius, which is below the freezing point of water. What's been neglected in this formulation is the importance of the infrared absorbers in our atmosphere, better known as the greenhouse effect. Although they're relatively minor constituents by abundance, water vapor, carbon dioxide, and methane are enough to raise Earth's average temperature 33 degrees to a happy 15 degrees Celsius. This is warm enough for liquid water to exist and life to flourish.
Files
I Could sleep in a car,
This took waaaaaay longer than I thought!
This place feels like an old boys’ club hangout. The owner’s at the counter and has been for thirty years. Next door you can get your shoes shined. Suits huddle at tables, talking finance. I don’t know if they’ve got a wifi connection or many available electrical outlets, but nobody’s going to throw you out for opening your laptop either. People here are working, whether they’re puzzling a crossword on their lunch hours or sealing a mega deal with a venture capitalist.
Before I started this journey, (and actually after, too) I used to see or hear about people who would get up at 4 and 5 am to run, bike, or participate in any other type of early morning exercise. My thoughts at the time….
Keep a look out for the middle of March when my birthday comes around
My sister Amber & my assistant Chris at Magical_Figurines have a whole slew of new double-sided metal dogtag necklaces, and they are up ON SALE for only $9.99. Click HERE to see the necklaces (or go to eBay and search by seller: Magical_Figurines under the advanced search option). This sale only lasts until MIDNIGHT TOMORROW NIGHT, so you have about 30 hours to go get some shopping done! That's a savings of $3.00 per necklace, and you can combine multiple orders to save on shipping, so it's a great time to stock up or do holiday shopping early. Chris & Amber are happy to ship anywhere in the world!
Do them at work, in the kitchen when you’re waiting for the kettle to boil, and try and make them part of your daily routine of looking after you and your ever-changing posture.
Drain the water completely. And pour the contents into a mixer jar.
Now some of us could conclude that this speaks to a lack of intelligence and self-preservation, but it really does give us a great example of perspective.
Of course, nothing is as simple as it seems, and the read wouldn’t be that interesting if everything went off without a hitch. In fact, the first part of the book, which is necessarily a bit slow as the main characters and the nature of the business are established, is fairly plodding and routine. There’s a bit too much focus on mundane details; authenticity in establishing a Chinese-Canadian community is important, but knowing exactly which types of dim sum Ava enjoys most at which restaurants in which areas of Toronto isn’t absolutely necessary for the overall narrative. And Hamilton does that thing that some Canadian writers seem to do, covering the locations in excruciating detail, naming exactly which streets, cross streets, and neighbourhoods his characters visit. (This is a bit of a pet peeve of mine. See Alyssa York’s otherwise lovely Fauna, Shaughnessy Bishop-Stall’s Ghosted, or Carol Shields’ Larry’s Party for other examples of this strange exactitude, as though the writers or editors are worried that people won’t be able to place the setting in Winnipeg or Toronto without mentions of Linden Woods or Jones Avenue or Castle Frank subway station.) As Ava begins the hunt for Antonelli and Seto, watching how she conducts business is interesting for the reader, but there’s no real urgency in the narrative. It’s all very interesting but not exactly page-turning. This may be a function of setting up a series (there are three books published so far and Hamilton has finished writing book six) and all the details of character and plot may be necessary to the larger oeuvre, but it’s also a bit boring.
60g ground almonds
Spend $15 on Participating Speed Stick, Softsoap or Irish Spring Products get $5 ECB (limit 1) Deal Scenario #1: Buy (8) Speed Stick deodorants $1.99 Use (4) BOGO in 1/29 SS (exp 2/15) Final Price: 37¢ each
much to my surprise.
My topic I’ve researched the most right now? Rationing and blackouts and the air war. You would think rationing wouldn’t be so intriguing, but I’m a foodie. So anything to do with recipes and its like Doug from Up. Research, research, SQUIRREL!
If you can empathise with a suicide bomber, why can't you empathise with Hitler? Was Hitler a robot, programmed to cause Right-wing death and destruction? What about Rudolph? Was he just pure evil, did he not believe he was acting for the greater good?
Sarah lied to God when she said she didn’t laugh. I think she actually believed she didn’t laugh. Sarah did not deny her thoughts, only her actions. Sarah didn’t care what went on inside her mind and spirit. She only cared that others perceived her as having her spiritual act together. How do we know? She only tried to hide the fleshly error, not the heart issue. No one knew how sarcastic she had grown towards the promises of God.
Have your tot wash their hands and grab their foot stool to help. Wash the fruit and cut any stems off that need to be removed (strawberries).
GC: Now, you’ve been in a lot of movies and plays, so what’s harder to prepare for?
14.SCREAM "Search for Employment"
“What’s that?” Em cried out suddenly and I jumped with a shriek.
was Jesuit-trained at Boston College.
What if there were no fields of disagreement–
- Photos – Look at the picture gallery for USDLA 2012 Conference
All good. But it is now about time to head out. Have a good one. Oh, it might be good to note that sometimes, against all odds, things do happen anyway. It is good, for a change, to... be up, showered, dressed, and looking to be on time... for once in... weeks? Yes, sadly. Good day.
At this point, put the tomatoes and some of the water into the blender, and give that a short whizz to chop up as much as you like. This step also helps to get out the last bit of paste from the bottom of the blender.
"Templates for home schooling? So now I'm supposed to feel bad that I'm sending my kid to regular school and not spending all day with her teaching her at home?"
First, let’s see what the Archangel Michael is all about. Michael represents a warrior’s strength to protect mankind and to negotiate a path to serenity. He is to protect from evil intentions and false illusions. We’ll pause there. Starbuck protects the fleet in any way possible during the entirety of the series, even if it means grabbing a crew together to float aimlessly in space to find Earth based on a feeling. She’s determined to kill any toaster that comes in her path, even if it means her own husband. Cylons were known to prey upon your feelings and turn your opinions upside down, but did she manage to ignore those falsehoods? It seemed to be on most occasion until she began listening to Leoben later in season three and throughout season four.
4) Keep stirring the gravy to prevent it from curdling for 10 minutes.
Turkey
tastes so good what else is out there I have been missing?
Judge # 2 -- The best yet. Aggressive use of peppers, onions, garlic. Superb.
Pintrest is cool and all, but I think people get all into ideas just becuase they think other people think it’s cool, or yummy or whatever. But it’s not.
Mr Bruce added: “British taxpayers want the support they give to go to places where it can make the most difference to countries where millions of people are at less than a pound a day.
Q. Have you experienced the power of prayer in the past? What did you choose to pray about? Was it easy for you, or did it feel foreign to you?
And the coolest thing of all is, they’re doing it because of something they feel deep inside. Not because IPO’s or WSJ hedcut portraits are beckoning. They have deep conviction that what they’re doing is right, and that alone could explain their success. Their incredibly hard work and perseverance doesn’t hurt.
Furthermore, 500 staff at Karate Bank got the chop.
Its funny how we forget things we used to love to do so much.
The two main characters here are grandmothers, both of them bound together by a murder, as one's grandson murdered the other's. (The film's title is, indeed, Tagalog for "grandmother.") Throughout the film, we observe both these devoted women try to do what they think is right by their grandsons; one gives his dead son a proper funeral even though it ends up costing them an arm and a leg, while the other goes to desperate lengths to scrounge up the money to reach a financial settlement with the other to drop the robbery-and-homicide charges against her grandson. They don't always act in the most honorable of ways, but Mendoza never loses sight of the loving impulses that drive their actions. He also once again evokes the squalid environment of the Philippines in visually and aurally brilliant ways, whether by shooting in long takes and wide shots to take in the lively environment around his characters, or overlapping his soundtrack to evoke a vivid sense of human hustle-and-bustle.
I have had dreams die. I have made mistakes. People have let me down. I have let people down, I have said many things that I regret. Dwelling on the past is like wrapping a noose around your neck and trying to walk forward. You can’t move forward, you will only choke. God doesn’t want this for me. He doesn’t want me bearing the weight of the past. Forgetting is much harder to do than even forgiving. Most often in my life, the hardest person to forgive is myself. Oh, how I want to go over old history and pick myself apart! No, God clearly says, be alert, be present. Today. This is all I have. Is my mind focused on the tasks at hand or am I drowning in a sea of past regrets and memories?
Pour over the vegetable stock to cover the potato and onions, then put into an oven at gas mark 6 until the potatoes are cooked through and the top is layer is crispy (about 50 minutes).
Continuing on yesterday's theme of familiar foods this is a staple that I make a lot. The granola is great on it's own, as a breakfast cereal, stirred into yogurt, or added to a batch of banana bread. Here I've layered it with some yogurt and fruit, fancy I know.
And making free with natural law?
You are SuperMom. You are so capable and smart and strong. You can do this. Go ahead, let it get to your head. Fix that darn leak in the sink yourself and then brag to all your Facebook friends about it. This is where the goodies come in... if you let yourself be single, you'll learn that you are capable of more than you imagined. You'll be more whole and at peace. It's not about giving attitude and saying, "I don't need a man!" It's about feeling great about yourself and choosing to share your life with someone else only when and if you feel really good about it and ready to do so. But by then, you'll have learned so much more about yourself that you'll be an even better mate. And if you choose to stay single, that's okay, too!
Punk rock will always mean a lot to me, and these songs
"Pevan!" Notia didn't need to shout, but her voice rang back from the roof of the Hall, harshly reminiscent of a pick breaking stone. When Pevan didn't stop, the other woman scuttled up alongside, fell into an uneven, sideways walk to keep pace. "Who gave you authority to go into action without me?"
South Africa is a breathtaking country with an incredible diversity of wildlife and landscapes. If you don’t have the opportunity to visit us on this trip, I hope you’ll start dreaming about a journey here in the future. The land, the animals, the people and the amazing journey of reconciliation that they are on – it is a place on Earth that everyone should experience. I’ve finally completed uploading pics from our vacation. Enjoy!
Party Councils Councillors
But because I got all that stuff done, I could spend the rest of the weekend eating leftovers, watching Christmas movies and reading The Hunger Games trilogy for the 89th time.
Thursday, November 17, 7:30 PM
Some might wonder how inventing a wholly new story nine months after the fact could strengthen Nifong’s case. Anyhow, the defense motion gives the lie to Joyner’s assertion that Nifong’s manipulation will allow DNA to vanish from consideration.
People, Ancestors, Angels, Spirit Guides, Christ, Creator, or whomever is responsible for these things:
She had to go fetch EMPTY jars. What was the point of that? Those empty jars would not provide anything for her and her two boys?
The prejudice began when the parents started making small talk with “Farm Lady.” They began asking, “How did you dye them?, Do you dip them? Does it hurt the little babies? Will they stay that color? Will the other animals shun them because they don’t look like them?”
9:35 I listen to Michelle’s brother Craig. This is not a “black” family, this is an American family. How much can Michelle Obama do, just by her mere presence in the White House? What a role model for the all-too-frequent African-American family with no father, just by default.
until next time, loves.
but is this where the dancing is done?
Color: Color
Here are some close ups
The Leafs won the Cup. I was 16, living in Toronto. I read the story the next day in the newspaper. Howe’s “Look out, John” comes to me 48 years later.
By the light of our combined torches we find where we are on their map. Lost. That's where - 'cept I'm not. I know exactly where I am.
All joy today dear readers. Nashville will inspire you to write. It is full of character and characters.
Pete Carroll
Xu Guan felt the recoil of the shotgun as he peered through the smoke at the end of the barrel. His enemy was down; nearly half of his head was missing. The last of the squad was still gurgling, choking on his own blood, a few feet away. Xu Guan turned and centered the old shotgun’s bead sight just below the man’s chin.
I used the River Silks Ribbons for this project. It was my first time to use the 13MM size. So lovely. It unfurled off the card and was ready to use. So pretty.
"go on dates 4 times a month"
The New Zealand Society of Authors (PEN NZ Inc.)
Let the damn kids in, UCLA. Be the cool guy for once.
2. Working with about ¼ cup portion of the dough on a lightly floured work surface, gently roll the dough into a log about ¼ inch in diameter. Cut the log crosswise into ½-inch pieces and place on the prepared baking sheet. Repeat with the remaining dough. Cover the gnocchetti loosely with plastic wrap and refrigerate until ready to cook.
-HUGE head butt to Ziggler.
Oh, Egypt. Where do I even begin?
Palm facing up – If you do that you open yourself up to something. So often we think that we can handle everything ourselves and don’t need any help from anybody.
I also sound like a beer guzzling sport fanatic when I read Speaker 7. I read something of hers and I find myself going, “COME ON! COME ON! YES, YES, YES!” If someone walked by my house at that moment they’d say that dude with the high voice must be watching the football game. Nope, this lady in her knickers is reading Speaker 7.
TEAPOT LIONFACE: Not that I recall. Hey, do you want this mouldy old sweatshirt?
This one, however, DOES. In fact, it's even a tad large.
But actually no-one knows when Shakespeare was born. He died on 23rd April 1616 and had been baptised 26th April 1564. It was customary to baptise babies within days of their birth in the mid-sixteenth century. Hence the convenience of assigning him one date for the beginning and end of his life.
This year we decided to introduce all the new citizens
Rode the six hundred.
I am a woman of Great Influence!!!
I wonder how other creative types handle this dilemma, assuming I'm not the only lucky person to struggle with it. :) I know I can't possibly be, although it's in the nature of this particular beast that it feels very isolating and tends to lead to a downward spiral of self-criticism.
I can’t even tell you how many times my best friend in college, Sherri, would yell “dork!” every time she saw me walking around campus (it was hilarious every time even more when I was actually going to the library to study which was very typical) or my basketball teammates (on every playing level) would call me a dork. I knew I wasn’t the ‘cool’ that many were striving to achieve. I beat to my own drum and just did what I wanted to do.
I had noticed before that all of your kids seemed to be named after cities...except Clayton. Is that one a city too?
“What are you writing? You look like a poleaxed ox each time you take a break between words. I know it’s not your strong suit, but don’t strain yourself more than you have to, cap’n,” Mellira said. She grabbed a loaf of bread and tore off the heel, pacing again as she pulled off small pieces of bread between steps. Half got eaten, and the rest littered the floor under her feet.
This morning it was not about not getting enough sleep. Nor was it that the weather was poor (64° and dry). Rather, it was about a twinge in my hip.
Way over a year removed from all this, I can honestly say that my life has calmed down quite a bit from then, even on the most harried of days, I don't feel the panic that I did then, thank God. What I do feel is change in the air...and that's a good thing. A very good thing.
Then, Fox News recognized that its viewers might wander off into the woods during even the briefest commercial message. So they started tantalizing their audience with an upcoming whiff of scandal to make sure they hang around during the break.
Postscript: A short while ago, I interviewed Hamilton Leithauser, lead singer for the band the Walkmen. Their latest album is called "Lisbon" (and lordy it's good, great retro sounds in the studio plus Hamilton's warm, wheezy ways with his voice). "We went there twice while recording the record," he told me, speaking of Lisbon. "Titling the record that just made sense in our minds. It's such a unique place, so incredible looking. It has its own feel, like nowhere else in the world. It's sort of out of the way, without the big museums and stuff to draw tourists. ... It felt like us, like someplace we could understand. It has its own feel. It's sort of out of the way. There aren't museums, etc., that draw you in like other places. The way it's laid out — it's built on a valley that leads down to the ocean. It's just this big swath of tile, little streets and beautiful buildings — nothing grand, just small joys. The whole city is built for cafe culture, with outdoor terraces all looking over the downtown on all sides. Great views wherever you go. I don't remember drinking tea there, but I could see it happening, on all those terraces. Good port, though. This special dish there is a nasty salty cod — it's gross, so salty you can't believe they eat it."
14.) Signed Exiled Rack Cards from YA Author RaShelle Workman
Many may think, as I did, that it is not really a big deal to detangle, or comb out as is said locally, your hair. There are different ways to detangle your hair, including using your fingers, a comb or a brush. The more research I did, the better I was able to understand the importance of detangling. Tangles cause knots and can lead to breakage or even hair loss. By detangling, you are minimizing the risk of hair strands forming knots, becoming weak and causing breakage. Since we lose on average 100 strands of hair every day as part of the normal hair cycle, it is necessary to remove these strands along with broken hair, dust, product build-up or debris – like animal fur – that may become trapped in, or on, your hair. These shed strands and debris weigh down and coat the hair, causing it to appear dull and lifeless. All the factors above will reduce the hairs’ ability to retain moisture and maximize its potential length. By simply detangling your hair on a regular basis can help your hair to retain length. The tool used and frequency of detangling is determined by individual preference and hair requirements.
It’s not often we get to write 11/11/11 as the day’s date. It’s so special that even Americans get to write it the same way as the rest of the world. So I was thinking about what recipe to post to celebrate such as auspicious day. Then it came to me: Malva Pudding. Most of you are probably thinking, what the (insert expletive here) is that? If you aren’t, that means you are either South African or you’ve eaten in my house.
What was General Zinni referring to, a ‘monkey tree’ organization? Much earlier in the video, General Zinni described the “Monkey Tree.” It goes like this:
There is so much more I want to share with you other than just Rob’s story, his life and his death. I want to share all the good that came for me from learning new things, ways to become more self aware, change your life, etc., so if any of you have any other suggestions for headings – I’d greatly appreciate it! Something with a nice positive spin would be lovely.
In the Bahamas commercial long-line fishing had been illegal since 1993 and shark parts could no longer be exported from the country–so that took care of the wasteful Oriental sharkfin soup industry, he was pleased to tell people.
The Opposition was relatively weakened by this move then, leaving only DAP and PAS as strong contenders in the elections that followed after 1969. UMNO in general have never tasted major defeat in the nation’s national elections at the federal level. They had in the process though tasted defeat in Kelantan and Terengganu.
There are only two episodes left and I have to say I’m glad. All the storylines feel very stalled and not particularly interesting. I feel like a lot is going to be thrown at us in the next two episodes as they wrap up the trial and hopefully get to the truth of Alejandro’s murder. But I can honestly say, I’m not really all that interested. I guess I just found tonight’s episode to be a little bit boring. Anyone else feel the same way, or do you like how these last few episodes are being handled? Leave me your two cents!
Parts of the
In order to address these questions we must first look at the observational evidence on
Special Offer from Alison's Pantry:
But before the next chapter begins, there is unfinished business to attend to. And up first is the zine. I have decided to go ahead with a print version of the survey, which I have been working on fervently. Expect an announcement with details soon. And for those of you with fantastic memory and great attention to detail (see Sarah Fishburn's last comment on the previous post), you may have noticed that only 6 of the 7 promised questions from the artist survey were actually posted on my blog. If you want to see the 7th, you will find it only in the zine!
After some research, these are some of the insect predictions:
What or who are you thankful for? Have you told them lately? Lent is the perfect time to share your appreciation.
some up-coming blogs will touch on the following:
Opening sequence, we see Data up close. Remember, he's been sorta humanized, so he's acting a lot more fluid. He's bending over a dark console/table in a dark room, suddenly he looks up. His pupils dilate, contract, dilate, contract, and then we see that he is mechanically massaging a corpse in the morgue in rhythm to his pupils. We shift to the corpse and it is becoming re-animated. It wakes up and although it's legs are stumps it regenerates what looks to be a whole, healthy body in a nice, crisp uniform and it leaves the room, a young officer zombie, excited about it's new body and hard to tell that it's not a human crew member.
Another book that’d be a good readerly companion to The Fires? Tom Wolfe’s The Right Stuff. In all sorts of ways, the books both sketch the schism that formed post-WWII, the schisms that formed as young pencil-protector-sporting horn-rimmed guys moved into territory that’d, until then, been exclusively the terrain of older, gruffer dudes who relied on feel, instinct and history instead of numbers, data, and stream-lined programs.
Doughnut – Kawaii Panda Doughnut- FreakyDesign – (Kawaii Fair)
First one, then two and finally three squid hover into view. Their long fin edges ripple them away from me. They watch with large hollow eyes, black as ink. I try to follow, but their water jet engines push them over a rocky ridge and out into open water. Out into open water where squid lures drift. They would have been better off staying with me. The squid fishers actually catch me instead. De-hooked I head back into the beach. My foot stings in the salt water and my head spins from the colour and life. I pass back into the land world, leaving the water world behind.
“No.”Junsu forbid him. “I just surprised. Please continue.”
That it was Owain’
I wondered how the other ladies in the ward were viewing me. In the space of 3 hours, two moms had lost babies but the reactions were very different. I had very little outward show of grief. I shed tears but they were quiet and mostly unseen. The other mother had cried aloud and at length. I voiced this question to Debbie and she reminded me that "we do not grieve as those who have no hope". Very true.
Actress Leisha Hailey is calling for a boycott of Southwest Airlines after she was escorted off the plane for kissing a girlfriend. Had it been heavy groping it would have been o.k said a TSA agent.
anyway, today is Mother's day! i know many voiced out that mother's day should be everyday, and to that i agree too, but to have one day where everyone everywhere bersepakat to treat their mothers, i think that is just awesome. but again, mothers should always be celebrated and treated specially everytime =)
Be taken seriously for a change. This does of course mean getting a complete personality transplant but who knows what medical marvels will happen in 2012.
11. Ugly
And then there was the horrible but creative (but, more than anything, horrible) poetry. A favorite stanza I wrote still lingers in my memory over 40 years later.
tunic-local boutique, leggings-target, tank-maurices, necklace-target, boots-vince camuto, michael kors watch
In Episode 5, I tackle the #1 question when it comes to young adult and middle grade!
Unable to document moments in our family's life that are firsts and some that just need to be filed away and remembered.
The highest concentrations of these vitamins and minerals are found in the tissues of kelp. Since kelp is such a valuable source of nutrients, it is often recommended as a dietary supplement, particularly for people with mineral deficiencies.
And then I realized that this mode of thinking had been building since last autumn, while I was forcing myself to finish Bluebird's sweater. The feeling intensified as I slogged my way through the sweater cardigan I made for Penguin, and my general disinterest has delayed any actual start on the cardigan that Junebug has pleaded for me to make for her.
Rnd 12-14: Repeat Rnd 11.
1 finding
The pink tassel was really the lesser of available evils, being the silk that clashed least with the red. I’m hoping the colour will have a similar protective effect on these scissors as my pink polka dot dressmaking scissors, i.e. they look sooo girly that no man will even think about borrowing them.
“What’s funny?” we asked him.
But, I think maybe she did something to Michael Jackson. Maybe there’s a scandal there. Maybe she’s stepping down because something’s about to come out. I don’t know, but I’m gonna just put it out there on your show so we’ll see.
1225 **D-XI/7(A)/1995. “On Desire: Thoughts at Seventy.” Alumni Class, Basic Program of Liberal Education for Adults, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1885(4), above, pp. 174-79.)
2010 was a bit of a revelation for me. Many of my favorite genre authors were without a new release or had them pushed off for another year, which left me looking at a lot of authors I've been meaning to try and also lots of discoveries and saw a decline in reading Epic Fantasy than in years past. 2010 also turned out to be the year of the Cross Genre book coming more to the forefront, which would include New Weird reads and many that probably would have gone under Epic. This is also the year that Steampunk has come into its own and no longer belongs with Sci-Fi where it has been for so many years, but as a genre all on its own. So without further preamble here are the best books I've read this year.
The first contact with other humans is the scariest thing you'll read in ASHES as Bick describes in gruesome details how it would be to view a girl pop an eye out of someone's socket. On top of the details there is the fact that Bick holds no punches, she lays everything out, gruesome, emotional and non-emotional. This isn't a story of how the "most centered and perfect person" deals with an apocalypse - this is the story about someone real, someone that weighs out their own survival, deals with a new world where just the act of finding something to eat is a desperate search. Bick mixes apocalypse zombie fiction with dystopian political narratives and makes it into something that is a little more than the usual young adult fiction. This book will get you thinking, scare the crap out of you and have your heart-breaking all in one paragraph. DON'T MISS THIS ONE. I haven't been this freaked out by a young adult novel in a long time.
Wireless printing is now available from students’ computers. Student ICT support staff at the desk on Level 1 can help with setting up the connection.
...my copy of Fingerprint 2! I'll admit, I had a tiny fear that somehow this was all a mistake, and my poster would not actually be in the book - but I have hard-copy proof now! It's a bit unreal to see my own work in the glossy pages of a legit design book. Check it out:
The alterations can be carried out after downloading the downplay and the software codes. You can booze out the alterations on your screen or laptop before incorporating the scene on the invoice. You can also play alterations online by passageway the Myspace record. Still, all alterations to the backcloth tally to be taped.
25. Bleeding Violet Dia Reeves
An honours graduate of the prestigious Rhode Island School of Design, Keinyo has been working as a professional painter and illustrator for more than 15 years. His watercolours, oils, collages and commissioned works are held by collections, galleries and public institutions in New York, Los Angeles and Washington DC, as well as New Zealand. He is the recipient of numerous awards for his work.
Sen. Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.), chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee’s foreign operations subcommittee, inserted the language. He warned this month that the NGO clampdown would affect the certification requirements.
*Toss jewelry you no longer use and make space for new pieces.
Naming the elephant in the room is where coaching and great leadership begin.
In high school I began making (and selling!) things I made out of herbs & oils. (Lip balms, lotions, teas, natural body sprays, etc... In college, my best friend & I sold more of the same things & expanded into pillows & clothing. SO... the reason you see lots of botanical artwork & nature-inspired spaces in my work is because it's something I'm really passionate about & it comes out, especially in my personal spaces & textile line.
661. Plate of Summer Roll with Hoison Plum Sauce, Pulled Pork, Chicken, & Cous Cous Salad @ Patrick & Tracy’s (Pumpkin Hill, PA) 3:42 p.m.
In the meantime I am making homemade jams and other goodies for the participants at the workshop. The local soldier beans, purchased from the Annapolis Farmers Market, have been made into a Shaker Baked Bean recipe where organic oranges, apples and molasses have been added to give it a special taste. My sister’s recipe for Cranberry Sauce is always a treat with a cheese tray and so three jars of it now sit on my counter ready to be delivered to the kitchen of the Workshop Facility. Here is the recipe:
I think if you live in a country that is plagued by bush/forest fires - they do develop a very clear method of dealing with it. As I say - this year has been great and I personally have only seen the helicopter once the whole summer! Amazing.
3. Capri Pizza - Best pizza in Indiana. I'm gonna miss the buffalo pizza terribly. They are the nicest guys, and they love making great pizza.
I love Alias (TV show) because Dad found it first. We bonded over that show. No TV show will ever be able to take it's place. We named our dog after the main character.
*Pattern Paper: Imaginisce
Brilliant, aren't they? Being an advertising professional., I dug into these ads a bit more. They were created by the agency Cultivator, who also represents New Belgium and Great Divide. As an advertising partner who clearly knows their stuff when it comes to craft beer, they did an excellent job with this campaign and kept it low cost. To produce the four spots, they only spent $10,000 (a modest production budget, for those unfamiliar) and one day at the brewing facility with Brewmaster and General Manager, Todd Ursy.
I will remember how, on the last morning when we were packing and checking and packing, Maisie found the underside of the wooden mantelpiece and gouged a hole in her forehead. How we stemmed the blood, called the doctor, and made plans to leave quickly. How, in the five seconds I put her down to open the car door, she found some dog poo and fell straight into it. And then proceeded to wipe it all over herself and anything she touched.
Tidy took two breaths, breathing in through her mouth, then out through her nose, as if she had to build up enough steam to get the words out. Then she said “You’re, you’re… you’re being friends with him fast.”
Maybe that is the ticket. Maybe I have a brain, a body, and an Axe, which I am not afraid to use, but I don’t have a heart.
Yesterday morning I had to call and cancel an appointment with a pushy salesman trying to get me to buy new gutters for my house. Under the mistaken impression that his firm would simply clean my gutters rather than propose a whole new installation, I made this poor man drive all the way from Charlotte to Rock Hill last week. I dashed his planned two-hour sales pitch about 15 minutes in, when I had decided that I (and he) urgently needed to be someplace else.
Lots of Korgis stuff up on iTunes. I'd never heard anything predating "Everybody's Got to Learn Sometime" (their top 20 U.S. hit from 1980) before and this track, as it turns out, is a treat. Was the b-side of their second single.
- Merchant
... I woke up this morning and had the desire to get my sewing machine out before starting work!
They fool the Chiliean authorities into thinking they are actually looking for gold but one commanding officer, Veneer, doesn’t believe them and anchors his destroyer just off the shoreline where the meteorite is. They bring a native Maghan Indian aboard, a native of the Cape Horn, and also the same one who found Nestor, for a guide.
Spiritual advantage – I digested 6 chapters from the Biblical book of Exodus this morning. My moral compass is pointed in the right direction.
But it’s not all bad news for border activists that the tea party has effectively absorbed them and their mission. More than 100 leaders of local anti-illegal immigration groups have now joined tea party chapters, according to Zeskind, giving their message a bigger platform. And even as their movement dissipates, their message grows louder. “The Minutemen put immigration on the map big-time,” Bierich says. One example of the tea party-Minutemen melding is the Rally for Arizona in Phoenix in 2010, which tea partyers organized and attended. Its mission: to support Gov. Jan Brewer’s state-level crackdown on illegal immigrants. Then there was the Mississippi Tea Party’s push for that state’s anti-illegal immigration law, which is modeled after the laws in Alabama and Arizona.
I was viewer #303 when that landed on YouTube circa 11:30 p.m. EDT Monday night. Bragging rights for being slightly ahead of the curve for that brief moment are mine.
R24
Objective: Respond to reports that Corvalle Chardonnay is worthy of our Operatives exacting tastes. If the wine is as good as reports have led us to believe, procure an ample allocation for our Operatives.
John Smith’s Grand National Record: 1998 Yeoman Warrior (1998 PU Bef 19th); 1999 Frazer Island (Fell 22nd) Andrew Thornton
However, after the whitening my dentists all came into the room to look at the results and they all smiled at me and said my teeth were SUPERRR white and the results were even better than they expected!
The Samsung Galaxy S III Smartphone launch event in London. The Korean manufacturer has stated that India is in the first list of countries getting their hands on the all new Galaxy S III.
Paul: How do you know what I mean, Timothy?
“Well that’s too bad because she’s finished her work and won’t be returning,” countered the ringmaster.
He came back with a taste for it and I was looking for something new to
I no longer have to order it months in advance at Temple Emanu-El to have it shipped in for us.
In the dream I turn to my model girlfriend Daisy Lowe at a Childish Gambino show and say, “See, he’s like The Throne and Lonely Island in the same dude!”
Two portable shrines (or “shrine models”) were found, one made of pottery (ca. 20 cm high) and the other of stone (35 cm high). These are boxes in the shape of temples, and could be closed by doors.
*This really was a weird episode.
Any yes, if you're counting, that's 4, I just couldn't decide!
How things might have been
Most of the queries that I originally responded to came from our Protestant brethren in Christ. These occurrences afforded me the opportunity to defend and clarify what Catholics believe with regard to the communion of saints, why we do, and to demonstrate that Catholic beliefs are in harmony with both Holy Scripture and the beliefs of the early Church.
Chinese chives, 1 bunch, cut into 1 " length
On a British tour with Eddie Cochran in 1960, Vincent played the hapless older brother to Cochran's cocksure pin-up. After one show they dived into a car as fans tore at them - it was only after they'd been travelling a while that Gene, hunched in the back seat, whispered "Eddie... Eddie... they got my pants."
Tuesday, January 16th–There was an ice storm. I watched “Henri Langlois: Phantom of the Cinematheque.”
You’re vocals make you sound sweet, but is this really the case?
Sunday November 15th 9am to 2pm, including:
Then I had work. When I had my lunch break I was this close to getting me something unhealthy and calorie-laden. I really just wanted something fried for some stupid reason. HOWEVER, I work with a girl who has a crazy nice lower body, the type that I am striving to get, and I looked at her nice calves and thought, No, that greasy nastiness is not gonna go in my body today because that is what I want my legs to look like, damn it. So thank you, co-worker, for unknowingly aiding me in making a good decision today. The decision to eat that same salad that I always do. Food ended up being all on plan today again. :)
I have this sort of obsession with Iron Chef.
if I cant run to you I’ll be there in spirit,
In Charles Little’s book among the notes he writes; ” As it happens, aluminum is a common constituent of forest soils almost every where, but it is locked up in aluminum silicates, and in this compound form is not available to trees and other plants, and therefore is no danger to them. But after acid rains come , the silicates were broken down, and the aluminum was freed to be taken up by trees and plants. The metal kills all roots first, this means that trees can no longer absorb and transport needed nutrients, such as phosphates, calcium, and magnesium-essential fertilizers that are themselves leached away from the soil by acid deposition, The trees are weakened and can be invaded by insects or pathogens or secumb to extremes of weather-or all of the above, in which case they die.” So dead grasses, dandelions, plants, weakened trees, beetles move in. I think years of contrails, and the more recent years of chemtrails has caused this reaction, and our trees are dying from it. Perhaps independent studies void of governmental duress, threats, manipulations, would show this with soil, water, and ring samples. I bet it would.
I arrived early on Tuesday afternoon with other national officers and enjoyed spending time catching up with them. At our national officer dinner, we learned about Mardi Gras krewes and got creative dreaming up our own krewes.
He is in deed our faithful Creator. He is very able to not only forgive us of our sins, but to see us through the messes that our sins have gotten us into. But He doesn’t stop there. After we have suffered a little while, He will restore us.
The Free Trade Inn in Newcastle is being taken over by Yorkshire's very own Hop-scented upstarts SummerWine Brewery next week (25th-27th). If you're yet to try James & Andy's wares and are up that way then do drop by - now's your chance. My personal recommendation would be Diablo IPA, which has fast become - in my humble opinion - their Flagship beer. However, such treats as Barista, Nerotype and their new Valencia ales will be on offer. In addition, there will be plenty of US-
There are a lot of people I want to thank for being a part of my life.
Which leads us to the papone’s stateside boy… you did know one of the GOP contenders is a roamin’ catchalick front man, right? No, not Dr. Paul, nor the mormonoid… that’s right, Rickster ‘The Saint’ Santorum, whose last name sounds taken straight out of mass in Latin. Spanish newspaper El País had an interesting article on the subject of the Rickster’s close, almost indecently intimate relation with the God’s Work sect, aka the catchalick mafia’s mafia, a virulent strain of old-school Spanish national-catchalickism that has found a fertile breeding ground in the USofA, notably in the Air Force and among Washington DC’s hardcore evangelical players.
director gets fired from yet another job, leaving her no choice but to take a gig directing a small town Christmas pageant in upstate New York. Stunned at how basic the production is, Vera attempts to back out, but is convinced by some of the locals to give their town a chance. To her surprise, the warmth and charm of the small town grows on Vera and she even enjoys the experience of directing the pageant.
“You have little understanding of the situation, sir!” was the Lord’s sharp reply. “What we have to support with our finances is much more than you could ever fathom!”
See Mario run. See Mario jump. See Mario eat mushrooms and grow up tall and then see Mario squat through filthy pipes infested with man-eating plants just to find some worthless gold coins.
2 cups coffee with cream and cane sugar
Be still, my soul; thy Jesus can repay
­­The large, intensely built grey pigeon frequents the jungles and woods of the West; most often seen in flocks of various sizes in fast trip. Wings make a noisy clapping sound when purged. Polytypic. Length 14.5" (37 cm).
But it really shouldn’t take that much scrutiny to stop torturing ourselves with forgiveness. I don’t think anyone reasonable doubts that there are benefits to letting go of anger and resentment—so why don’t we just use that empowering language, and free ourselves from Western philosophy’s semantic rack. Like so many other terms that have been corrupted by religion in order to disempower and subdue people, we can just leave the word “forgiveness” behind instead of driving ourselves crazy trying to work with it.
I’m sure there are editors who hate agents and agents who hate editors, and I know there are terrible people in every business. But for the most part, I enjoy my colleagues on both sides of the divide. More importantly, I love being an agent. Which is why I do it!
BANANA BROWNIES (EGGLESS)
"Talk" to you all soon!!!
Back in its heyday from the mid-1980s to the mid-1990s, almost every Malaysian had a Proton car.
Parti-gyle brewing is an ancient technique that uses one mash to make multiple beers. The classic example is of course the "Belgian Hierarchy" of Tripel, Dubbel, and Single, each made with a subsequent mashing of one grain bed. This allows for a greater variety in styles while cutting the length of a brew day, in contrast to brewing multiple beers from several mashes. Needless to say, the shortened brew day can have significant advantages, from reducing brewer's exhaustion to not getting harassed by one's significant other that you "wasted" your whole day on your "dumb hobby" (DISCLAIMER: Mrs. Muckney Brewing does not consider brewing a "dumb hobby", or so she says).
The process started in November 2008 when the Southern African Development Community (SADC) tribunal ruled in favour of Michael Campbell and 78 Zimbabwean farmers that the land reform programme in the country was “racist and unlawful”.
However, I have a problem with taking flowers to someone sans a vase. Pourquoi you ask. I don’t like to put the hostess in a position of having to search for a vase while she’s greeting guests. In fact sending flowers the day before the party, or the day after is the rule in France. So I keep a spare vase to use for such an occasion. It’s an all purpose kind of vase that will hold almost any bouquet. Problem solved.
Manufacturers also need to look at better battery options - either as default , or in worst case as available battery packs. My phone has a 1350mA capacity battery. Why cant it have a 2500mA battery pack ?
Last Wednesday my mom and I were having a quick breakfast at the Starbucks of an unusually empty, large Barnes and Noble store. We had been talking about the Paperback Book-X-Change and its quirky owner Mike, and I found myself toying with an idea that I'd often mused about the past: opening a bookstore of my own.
Date: Wed, 6 Oct 2010 13:51:42 +0100
The sisterhood such a neat little program. You get to learn new skills and hone some old ones and while you do that, you earn merit badges! How fun! Not only that but they have a companion program for kids too so my little ones can join in (at no additional cost) and earn badges too. Well, my daughter can anyway, Nolan is a little to young yet, besides, if it doesn't involve cars or trucks, he has no interest (LOL)
Today was the last day of the Fall session of Fordham Law Scool’s Rikers Youth Education Program. This morning I woke up excited about seeing the guys do the guys shine during their mock trials. By this this morning, they would have gotten familiar with the facts of the case, developed their testimonies for their time on the witness stand, and developed strong argument against the opposing side. There would be several mock trials happening at once since we had such a large group. The roles the guys took in the mock trials were defendant, plaintiff, defense attorneys, prosecutors, witnesses, and jury members. We had outside attorneys come in to act as the judges.
as he realized the source of the flavor that lingered on his tongue.
First premiering in America on Mnet US, 2NE1TV will broadcast on 7/17 at 8PM PST.
A post over at beerpulse.com quotes the Schlafly brewmaster calling for an end to the "craft beer" distinction. Not sure if I agree with this one and it seems rather odd coming from a smaller brewery. What do you guys think?
Why we need to persevere
I know your heart is good and eager to assist others on their journey, but sometimes it takes a little reminder like this to jog your memory and bring it to the forefront of your mind.
subject: Hi There!
They are great and the sweet dip makes it fun. You can use your favorite dip.
610. Fried Forks Farm Free-Range Egg over Beet Greens & Sprouts w/ Sweetwater Multigrain Bread & Birchrun Hills Honey & Sea Salt Cream Cheese @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 12:52 p.m.
I was unconscious again but this time it was for a longer period of time. This time I lost connection to the world. I forgot I was giving birth. The pain vanished. No more doctors or nurses around. No hospital, no buildings, no streets and no humans. I was waaaaaay further. I experienced nothingness. No one and nothing but God and the feeling of the experience. Only a question crossed my mind “what am I to do now? Or what will happen now?”. This feeling stayed for a short while. Just me, God and nothingness.
I feel good. I feel strong. I feel alive. I AM ready for the new adventure to continue. Thank you.
The Uniformed Firefighters Association, for one, contends that fire response times have risen, not declined, as Bloomberg has reported. Union President Steve Cassidy asserts that, under the new system, at least one portion of the time between the receipt of a call and the arrival of trucks at a fire is no longer counted.
Sheri turned away from me unexpectedly and began walking in the direction I knew to be her dorm. For a couple of seconds I was actually at a loss as to what her sudden departure meant. “Well,” she said still walking away from me, “are you coming? You can’t expect me to go around naked anyplace but the bedroom and some private spot on the beach now do you?”
“Her actions were directed at random people based on their ethnicity, and that’s according to her own statement,” said a spokeswoman for the Palm Bay Police Department.
I got a tub of stuff ready for the garage sale. I rumor there was one in the future. I'm ready.
326The hallow'd taper trembling in thy hand,
Dear Heavenly Father, I thank You for Your Word, the entrance of which has given me light and understanding today, concerning true worship! Thus, from the depths of my heart this day, I worship You for Your goodness and grace towards me, I thank You for making me a heir of the eternal salvation You wrought through Christ Jesus! Amen!
This is the phone RIM is handing out to around 2,000 developers this week at the developer-only BlackBerry Jam event (with new developer tools including the Cascades framework that will give BlackBerry 10 apps their signature look), so they can build apps before it comes out rather than after.
Finals will start on Monday. My week and a half of finals goes a little like this:
Here is the info from an email that I received from them yesterday:
We hope you like her! Looking forward to reading all of your entries.
Where did your consciousness go?
Gideon's Corpse, Preston & Child - Gideon Crew is called on to try to talk down a crazed gunman who worked with him in the lab in NM or AZ... He can't, the man dies, and Gideon is caught up in Armageddon-to-be... This is the 2nd story about Gideon Crew, I believe, and I'm hoping for several more...
And finally, my #1 reason to have a wedding blog...
Why am I not surprised that no one on the right end of the political spectrum reads my blog? I now have a new poll up, which is on the sidebar, same as before. :-)
Lent’s about little dyings.
But a famous tragedy becomes personal when Casey meets Thomas Andrews, the man that Sam recognizes will build the doomed steamship, Titanic. In love with Tom, and determined to save his life, Casey will do everything she can to prevent history's most notorious maritime accident.
a foot is four palms
Heart can be soul.
The whole point of the trivia segements is to put the viewer in the victims place. For that to work you have to ask a question that they could plausibly answer. Or more importantly in the case of this rather obvious Friday The 13th question, plausibly get wrong. Remember, this is 1996. The last Friday had come out only three years before. Jason was still very much in the cultural lexicon at this point. Mrs. Voorhees not so much. While it is unlikely that the average Teenager would have seen Friday The 13th "Twenty Goddamn times" she would have seen it. And Jason would have been the first thing to pop into her head.
The event will be sponsored by True Honor Clothing, Pepsi, whose products include Gatorade, Aquafina, and Gatorade Energy Bars, and Crossfit 516. It coincides with a Salute to Veterans on the evening of the event.
1) Grease a 8 x 3-1/2 inch loaf pan and preheat oven to 170 deg.C.
The last time I saw Emily was at an EDWG meeting in late September where, and how ironic this seems now, she told us she had worked out her book ended. At a street party, Isla, the child protagonist of Our Street, climbs up on a table and demands silence while she speaks. Once she has everyone's attention, she announces all she has seen during her investigations. Emily described a beautiful, redemptive scene in which people would first be shocked, then shamed and ultimately healed. Although she will never write this scene now, in her mind the book was complete and I am able to share the resolution she planned here. At times like this, there is a strange pattern to the universe.
Poltoranin, who had been in his job since 2005, was, of course, unemployed within hours of voicing the truth which date not speak its name. According to Reuters:
I wasn't sure about the Sardines after the first bite, but had a couple more and ended up liking it! Probably won't be a regular on the menu (hubby was not thrilled), but I am definitely less intimidated by them now!
This decision is a tremendous blow for those who have worked on the UPLS proposals. These include members of the EU Commission, Senior Judges and leading patents practitioners, including our own Kevin Mooney. Many will view this decision as the Court of Justice seeking to be the judicial body overseeing any single patent litigation system that comes to fruition in Europe. This was the one single issue on which the Commission, industry and the lawyers agreed at an early stage in drafting the proposals to be undesirable. This is because, according to this view, the Court of Justice does not have the necessary expertise in this area of law. It might be thought that some attempt could be made to amend the proposed UPLS system or to go back to the drawing board completely. But, the essential reasoning for the decision is that the Member States cannot divest to an international body their powers as part of the European Union order over matters that will, inevitably, require the implementation of European Union law. So the reasons are fundamental and appear to rule out any revision of the UPLS or a return to the previously attempted European Patent Litigation Agreement (EPLA) proposal. It seems that alternatives to a system presided over by the Court of Justice have run out. The latter view is supported by a recent advance with the proposed single, pan-EU patent called the Unitary Patent in which, for only the second time in its history, the European Parliament voted for the “enhanced cooperation procedure” to be used to push this through, despite opposition from Italy and Spain on the language regime that is planned to be adopted. Decisions on such a patent would be made by the Court of Justice.
Fortunately I had left a couple of hours in case I got lost. Fifteen kilometres and one hour later, I was folding and packing the bike. Ten or fifteen minutes later and a few questions, I was in the right terminal.
One way I’ve tried to reduce the fat in this recipe is by using sirloin instead of stew meat. Based upon my own observations, there’s been this weird shift in recent years toward charging more for traditionally inferior cuts of meat (like stew meat and flank steak) so buying sirloin in a club pack and freezing can even save you money. The drawback, however, is that it can be tough. So I would advise you, in this case, to cut the pieces smaller and simmer even longer for tenderness. You could also try tenderizing the meat before cooking. Decide for yourself what you think.
doesn't cling to rock and crag
"Mr Hunter, if you'd be so kind?"
They were each Tarn, but each was unconscious of their former unity.
Happy Weekend!
He answered, “Yes!”
Our Winner, Tammy, receives 2 download pages from THATB
3 population
Tonight we are at the hospital. My SIL has had a Caesar and I've just taken photos of my precious little niece. She is beautiful. I'm not just saying that. She is. The marks of death are not yet on her and I am so grateful for that.
i had to fill up the tank to have the opportunity and ability to do that.
But seriously, isn’t that a little strange? It’s possible Wong had the meth with him all along, even though he had been “processed” by the feds (we see how well their processing, uh, process works out). On the other hand…what if this was in fact some kind of sinister John Dies at the End-meets-1984-esque experiment of some kind? (Spooky that the poor kid’s name is even D. Wong.)
And that’s not even a statement about the death penalty. You often hear that “justice is served” when a convicted criminal is executed. They were brought to justice when they were arrested, not when they were found guilty or executed.
There is a handy colour picture of the design on the cover sheet, along with the dimensions of the finished design. A separate sheet of detailed stitching instructions is also included. They are well laid out and easy to understand, making this kit suitable for any anyone from beginner upwards in my opinion.
If you're ready...
DRAKE (as if surprised)
We left for 3 days to visit my sister, the first of our 12 straight days of 100+ degree heat and the stupid deer, looking for moisture, ate everything in sight. We came back to pathetic sticks sticking out of the ground.
Last quarter, of the 54 responding banks :
Book Club will meet on Tuesday this week! Bring your “The Boy in the Striped Pajamas” book. See you after school in the library!
Encasa Deli is the latest undertaking by the owners of Encasa Restaurant on Pitt Street, heading north into the city and moving into Spanish groceries, deli smallgoods and sandwich lunches for office workers on the run.
or join me for the greatest adventure yet!
Most people interested in natural health will understand that artificial sweeteners are not healthy for you. But nearly everyone of us leads busy lives that limits us from reading all we would like to, especially about things that may not be that much of a problem anyway.
I only modified the triceps push ups by doing them from my knees, which had support underneath since I was on a hardwood floor.
So if you want to follow my blog through that, feel free to follow on there again...and if not, you can always follow through Bloglovin' as well. Both options are on the right sidebar of this blog!
avant-garde
- that’s a pirate flag he’s flying, so cops reading this take heed,
I am very grateful that I found myself becoming more comfortable with writing and learning more about the craft of conveying one’s thoughts into written word. I know I have a long way to go in my writing lessons, but I am excited about this layer of creativity that I am adding to the ever evolving “me”.
An antique dentist's chair equipped with extraction tools is not the usual thing a landlord expects to find left behind in an average rental property.
i stand there absolutlyfuckingbewildered...
Do you remember when the internet was actually something that only the “rich” could afford. Or, if you were lucky, they had it at school for research. I remember when my mum first got it on and I tried to play Neopets. I could go to the page, and make mum a cuppa whilst it loaded. Any way, I digress… a lot…
192 pages. Index. Bibliography. 9¾” x 6¾”.
Yesterday I spent hours on photography forums and the Nikon Support forums, posting the picture of what my camera is doing, asking if anyone has dealt with a DSLR with this issue and I got some feedback. Many said the words I assumed and feared “Your sensor (the brain of the camera) is dying and the cost to repair it would be more than replacing.” A few others suggested I do a “hard reset” on the camera, restoring it to factory settings to try and breathe one last breath of life into it. I took their advice and reset the camera, did quite a few tests on it, took about 300 pictures with different settings and uploaded them to my computer and was pleasantly surprised! Only a handful of pictures corrupted which is much better than it was doing. So I think it has a shoot or two left, fingers crossed.
For those that don’t know the back story, she resisted for like a decade reunion. She made quite frank and funny jokes. She said she felt so much more free in her whole life now that she has dumped the shame because she OMG had sex! Oh what the societal gaslighting does to us all. Arbitrary social mores that are actually very fluid give it ten year, twenty. Her story is so inspiring because it is transcendence. “Do you know how few people get to experience that?” I asked. She said she had the support of her extended family and that helped. She said, “My daughter!” really loud. She said that felt good to say.
2. Sequence 02 (04:52)
I am so excited for her 2nd Birthday, wait till you see what I have planned. A French Poodle Party, and if I can pull it off, I will feel a huge relief when it's all over. I'm also excited for my niece Bella's 1st Birthday party this weekend! I miss my brother, sister-in-law ans nieces terribly since we live about two hours away. And I know Nik wil have a blast at the party. She had so much fun with her triplet cousins at Daddy's party tonight.
Don't forget I have a give away going on right now, celebrating 800 followers, if you have not left a comment yet, there is still time. You can find the posting at the top of the page.
Chasing after you....
the playmate
“Pues, está bien. Well, okay then.”
There are parallels with other industries, of course, although they all need to be prefixed by mutatis mutandis, because our eyes don't work in the same way as our ears, so the shift from cinefilm to digital moviemaking is not the same as the shift from wax cylinders to digital tape to mp3 files. And different again is the shift from manuscript to printed book, to e-book: the medium in which our words are transmitted is secondary to the message it carries, and the printed book is a near-perfect, and astonishingly cheap, technology when you compare it to the paraphernalia of even the most guerillerish of film makers or sound artists.
Embers
She has been less effective arguing against FBI counter-terrorism sting operations that she dismisses as forms of
This collection of short narratives are easy to read and full of eye catching illustrations. Topics included are Captain Cook, The First Fleet, Bass and Flinders, Buckley's Chance, Crossing The Blue Mountains, Gold, Burke and Wills & Ned Kelly.
When we act as a national community for the common good, we are strong, and we are all better for it. When we do not act as a national community, we are ruled by special interests, by people who have an agenda that applies only to themselves. These days the special interests are the very rich, who have chipped away at our national wellbeing for decades, leaving a nation badly divided by politics and controlled by wealth alone. We have become so politically alienated that we even refuse to approve of things that would benefit everyone.
But, even with once a month cooking, there are nights that I forget to thaw out a dinner and Im stuck trying to throw something together. Since I know that I will enevitably forget to thaw something out several times a month, I always keep some key ingredients on hand for some super fast and easy meals.
.calgon
Life Lesson: The resurrection of Our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ from the dead changes everything.
Read Mores that Need More Love:
Stopping bent practices such as cronyism and embezzlement can save lives in poor countries, Transparency International said on Tuesday as Somalia, Iraq and Myanmar again came bottom in its global corruption rankings.
Thank you all so much for participating in the Blog Hop for Whimsy this past week and for all of the lovely comments you left for me. Mr Random.org has made his selection...and the winner is.....
Don your green apparel and join other Celtic Greenvillians on March 15th for a St. Patrick’s Irish Pride Walk along Main Street. Sponsored by the Ancient Order of Hiberians, this short sidewalk stroll from Piazza Bergamo to City Hall (and back) honors Ireland’s culture and beloved patron saint. This mini-parade begins at 11:30AM and all are welcome to participate.
Each time you made me cry and you felt proud of it
Hat's or Flowers is the chosen theme to reflect Australia's most famous horse race The Melbourne Cup! It's a time for frocking up donning a hat or fasinator heading down the the local race track, club, pub, restaurant or office boardroom - to drink some bubbles or beer - eat some food (prawns, chicken and salad at my work) and have a bet on the cup and enter the office sweep!
If you only see value in STEM disciplines, I probably will not convince you that humanities education is valuable. There used to be a sense in this country that certain things had value and meaning in their own right, not simply because they produced nice technological gadgets or made bundles of money for businesses. Even conservatives such as Allan Bloom used to realize that it impoverishes us spiritually when we turn away from the humanities, the cultural legacy of Western society. Would that their political descendants had as much grace or wisdom.
By his own all-powerful magic (sva-māyā).
I am so happy about this, so terrified about this, and so very ready for this.
The two weeks mentioned seemed excessively early until a lab lost my specimens and the tests had to be repeated. I was lucky enough to receive a call from the nephrologist’s office asking if I’d had the tests since they hadn’t received the results and I had an appointment in one week. With the explosion of Chronic Kidney Disease in the last decade, there’s no guarantee that your doctor’s office will have the time to offer this courtesy. Call to make certain your lab results have been received a week or so before your appointment to prevent wasting your time and that of your doctor.
Do you know what happens when your 6 year old bakes muffins? - you digress so far from the original recipe that it bears only a slight resemblance to what you intended to bake. Almonds get turned down (because nuts are good only with chocolate, Amma), chocolate chips get added in (there's so little left in the packet Amma, lets finish it) and finally the muffins miraculously sprout sprinkles on top (Please Amma, can we have sprinkles on top - Please, please pleaaaaaase).
6/5- PCW Loose Cannons Unleashed 8 from Milwaukee, WI
Good communication skills!
It seems that while, on the one hand, we have this vision of a "coach" that is based on our knowledge of high school and college coaches that handle virtually everything for the athlete, the job of the professional coach is more the role of trainer - to prepare the athlete for competition. The professional track and field athlete having a "team" of other professionals that take care of the other varied needs of the .
Still, the characterization transcends that. At first glance, Seth and Peyton are like any odd couple–Seth is a messy, passionate genius, while Peyton is a diplomatic and mild-mannered genius. But there’s more–the overly dramatic Seth can be annoyingly dedicated to being anti-mainstream (to the point of having one of his infamous fights with Peyton over their very first single), and Peyton can be steely and just as passionate. Since I’m not a dedicated Beatles fan, I’m not sure how much characterization comes from having Lennon and McCartney as templates, but all I can tell you is this–Seth and Peyton are very human and I’m quite impressed with how Brite made them so, given the natural limitations of the novella. Their relationship feels almost inevitable; of course these two people who understand each other on so many levels are destined for each other. I would have loved for more build-up to the moment Seth confesses his love and for their relationship as a whole (Peyton appears to just go with it instead of reciprocating at first), but, again, this novella is very unrelenting in pace. Their life as a couple is touching; Peyton relates the story of how he forced Seth to kick his heroin habit, and when Peyton goes to identify the body (which is superfluous, due to their fame), he demands the orderlies allow him to wash the body and prepare it for the funeral.
I can’t remember how I first came across the photographer Bob Carlos Clarke, but I know I loved his work from the moment I saw it. I guess this quote taken from his book Obsession just about sums up how I feel.
I am loving my new rota, I work mon-fri evenings, and sat mornings. I get Thursdays as my day off WOOOOOOOOOOOOP WOOOOOOOOOOOOP That leaves me time to sleep and be a lazy bone :)
Still she dare gon’ play, she backed it up
We are all here just to disappear sooner or later.
Antoniette Santopadre of Valley Stream was expecting a $250 stimulus check. But when her son finally opened it, they saw that the check was made out to her father, Romolo Romonini, who died in Italy 34 years ago.
Ms Wong claims that she never actually downloaded the film, did not tell anyone else to download it, and did not know anyone was using her internet service to download the video. She also argues that the settlement letter sent to her was designed to coerce her into settling the case despite the absence of any facts supporting liability against her.
I just got notice that we received a huge shipment of new spring 2012 fashion scarves. I am in the store all weekend and will have these beauties ready for sale tomorrow am.
It would be helpful to GO TO EUROPE AND PRACTICE THE CALCULATION, as in days of old, but we're not quite there yet.
We think of you stretching your canvas, mixing
The Dead and The Gone by Susan Pfeffer
This card uses an emboss resist technique. It didn't come out very good as the stamp I used (I think) was too small to get a good background definition. The image on the label is the image I used in the background. The strip at the side was punched using a Fiskers border punch. I added gems for the flowers. I'm not really happy with the card. I'm going to have to work on my emboss resist technique and really work on my sponging.
This is the perfect outfit if I was a 34 year-old mother of 4 young children aged 9, 6, 4 and 18 months. Great to hide the post-maternity excess, comfortable for sitting on the floor with the young ‘uns and running after them. But I’m not 34, I’m not married and I’ve never ever given birth. *sigh*
"What? You're kidding.." he says, looking at me disbelievingly.
APISARNTHANARAK A, MUNDY LM. Influenza outbreak among health care workers in an avian influenza (H5N1)-endemic setting. Clin Infect Dis 2006; 43: 1493-1494.
Tracking foot steps of foreign foe
I always thought that once a day of doing number 2 (pooping) is the normal and most healthiest way ever. But Dr. Invan Olegario, a product physician and a credible medical adviser of one of the most well known pharmaceutical firms in the country said more than once is the most healthiest. It was just that people are so busy that they can only go to the toiled to move once a day.
Savitz DA, Sonnenfeld NL, Olshan AF. Review of epidemiologic studies of paternal occupational exposures and spontaneous abortion. Am J Ind Med 1994; 25: 361-383.
During the tour made by Sandoval northern beaches, the authorities found that the dolphins continue to beaching.”
Catherine’s thoughts: I must now calculate how long it’s been since I was with my ex-fiancée. Damn you Brian McKnight.
Prayer for me is like breathing. I find myself in a constant conversation with the Lord. I know, that if my kids know anything about me is that I pray, a lot. Lately, the prayers have been out loud and more desperate, "Oh Lord, please help me, I need You to make it through this day!" I believe firmly that prayer works. God hears my call, and more importantly that I am the one transformed as I do. I could write a good many things about prayer and the legacy I want to leave my children. But, I heard this quote the other day and it truly sums up my heart. I am not one to say something that others have said better. So I thought I would share this with you:
Of course they want the students to side with them and reject the actual scientific proofs and be good little Christian boys and girls so they can assure the cultural reproduction of the fundamentalist creationist ethos.
We warned the authorities that unless the Government took firm action against these evil haters of all things British, they would become more provocative. Well, now as predicted, it’s happened. It has just been announced that the organization ISLAM4UK, (a platform for the fanatical Al Muhajiroun group) led by Mr. Anjem Choudary (pictured above) and a mob of at least 500 Islamic extremists plan to defile the memory of our dead soldiers by marching their hatred through Wootton Bassett!
I'm curious- do any of you take your breakfast from a tray? Do you set an elaborate table for breakfast from time to time?
If it weren't for the chicklit cover.
In the passive hydraulic unit, the fluid is displaced not from one chamber to another, but via pipes through a valve block and into the opposite hydraulic unit. How the upper and lower chambers are interconnected left to right make the system react differently to inputs from the suspension. These being a resistance to roll or heave.
And once again, sing its joyous song.
The Women's Club is run by a guy in a large hat with a feather in it.
We started hanging out every weekend. We would go to the gym, eat out, shop, travel, meet guys, go clubbing. He would accompany me on my errands, my chores. He was my de facto "date" during company events, birthday parties.
Sounds interesting, I’m listening. What do I have to do?
No more glasses for me, suckas! It may be crazy to willingly pay some doctor to inject an implantable collamer lens into my eyes but I did and now I can see perfectly without glasses or contact lenses, so yay me! The website FAQ fails to address this issue: if you default on your financing, does Kremer take back your eyes?
So, I was reading through an old journal to find something for my mom (and brother) and kept flipping to the end. I have Thank you, Happy Birthday and I love you in 7 languages, You're welcome in 2 (which is strange, since I know it in 3), and then
Field of Dreams
But honestly, I'm terrified of buying much online right now in general. Ha:)
Well, sort of. Just a new header really but it does change the whole look of the blog. I wanted a change to hurry spring along! It has actually been gorgeous here these last couple of weeks. Temps in the 60s and 70s is fabulous!
And perhaps, if you really want to help, you could plant their host plants. Nettles (I know, we gardeners do not like nettles) but they are the host plant for many of our butterflies.
Overall: This beer is nice and drinkable. Carbonation is right inline with the malt/hops, and the alcohol (even thought a bit high) does not overshadow the rest of the beer.
Dave will leave with experience of working in a small brewery. He will also have refreshed his memory of many of the lines from the film Scum, and some even from Commando (two of the greatest films ever made). I will miss his cups of tea, the finest the company can offer, but now he is moving on to a brew pub in York.
TOMIS ID: 00324937
In 1997, Charles Taylor was elected president and Morris was selected for VIP training at the executive mansion, serving for 3 years in the president’s motorcade, the army being the only life he knew. But he was feared by former friends and shunned by the community for his deadly actions as a child soldier, and in 2000 he dropped his weapons and moved to Ghana to rebuild his life. Yet his past continued to haunt him in the Buduburam refugee camp where for three years, he had to struggle to survive, surrounded by people whose families he had helped to murder.
I found that there is a new place in Novato with a Japanese twist. TJ's Take Out has been purchased and is transitioning the menu and signage to become Neo Tataki. The inside has been spiffed up with new paint and menu and the greetings and service are quite friendly.
When the Sabbath was over, Mary Magdalene, Mary the mother of James, and Salome bought spices so that they might go to anoint Jesus’ body. As they entered the tomb, they saw a young man dressed in a white robe sitting on the right side, and they were alarmed. “Don’t be alarmed,” he said. “You are looking for Jesus the Nazarene, who was crucified. He has risen! He is not here. See the place where they laid him. But go, tell his disciples and Peter, ‘He is going ahead of you into Galilee. There you will see him, just as he told you.’” (Mark 16:1, 5–7)
this is an easy, fast, delicious and super nutritious recipe that's totally going to be in regular rotation over here. i love that the greens are very lightly cooked – not only is it healthier but the finished product is the most vibrant shade of green. recipe below!
so that we can comfort those in any trouble
Grazie e mille per la vostra partecipazione.... non dimenticate di cercare ogni giorno la finestra del Calendario dell'Avvento..... avrete la possibilità di vincere ancora tanti bellissimi premi!!!
The postal votes are being sent out today and you should start receiving them soon. It is always best to fill it in and send it back as soon as possible, then you won’t forget.
All of the couples are unlikeable. They lash out at Hilary and they belittle Visentin.
Every day, groundhogged stunted
Thus begins a globe-trotting adventure that takes Hunt and his team-by-default to Dubai and Mumbai in India, following Cobalt (Nyqvist) and his lackey Wistrom (Edelmann) and put them squarely in the path of lethal assassin Sabine Moreau (Seydoux) who had earlier murdered Agent Hanaway (Holloway who was Sawyer in TV’s “Lost” as you might recall) who also had been Carter’s lover. Carter is a bit cheesed off at Moreau because of it.
I haven't had time to read about the new Googlie-do policy.
First of all I'd like to say a big thank you to Fleur for her guest post last week. While I didn't feel like posting, I still wanted to keep the blog 'alive' so to speak, and I am grateful for her lending her time and pretty face to my humble blog. Thanks doll!
Any now watch the video and learn how they attempt to silence Richard in his work as the terrier down the rat hole of City Hall. Watch the end where Richard throws down the gauntlet to the Mayor?
We decided to stick to the tar road and head down our Western boundary not looking for anything imparticular but being aware that it is a good region for Rhino. As much as we don't like the tar road it is never a bad option first thing in the morning as many animals are attracted to it. On our journey we first found a nice herd of Giraffe followed by two very nice Elephant Bulls, one of which put on a very nice show for us. First eating at eye level alongside the vehicle
Layer 3: 2 7/8" Square
“You are very long-lived! As you can see from this thousand-year sacrifice we have begun, we are also long-lived and patient.”
How could Audrey have legally protected herself? This is a difficult question to answer, as obviously the salon story line has not included many legal facts to be able to determine what is going on.
For hourglass shapes…
a raindrop glory
Perhaps Tatlin’s Tower exists after all – but we’ve been looking in all the wrong places.
Although its name sounds like a euphemism for a young, sassy, creamy-skinned vixen, a butter tart is precisely what it suggests. Take a pie. Shrink it to tart-size. Make it of butter, sugar, salt, vanilla and eggs. Beyond this there is great debate: should it contain corn syrup or maple syrup? Raisins or no raisins? Be runny or firm? How firm should the crust be? Like so many beloved staples and entrenched traditions, controversy surrounds the tart issue like some sort of rigid, overcooked crust, causing a culinary rift and me to mix metaphors. Then there’s the issue of flair. Some people drizzle tarts with caramel. Some add walnuts, pecans or currants, even chocolate chips and dates. Others who we might call “purists” like their tarts unadulterated – simple, not plain – so that the natural flavors stand out. This, they say, is the only truly Canadian tart.
I had seen this recipe on the web a couple month ago and I was dying for an excuse to make this! I invited some friends over for some hot tubing, wine and dinner and made this! This comes from Skinny Taste, one of my favorite healthy eating websites. She is a great resource for those of you who do weight watchers.
In dreams,
I actually brewed 11 gallons of this, but the recipe below is proportioned for the more common 5.5 gallon batch (accounting for some loss in the kettle and the fermenter, with 5 full gallons in the keg):
That note, in Buckley’s rendition
1) if is yellow, let is mellow ie. if it is only urine then don't flush after each visit
I sometimes fantasise about a brighter, energised, joyous, fully awake me in a parallel universe. In this reality I am not a mum. I feel ALIVE. I am pursuing a fulfilling career as a therapist. I have time for exercise and spiritual pursuits like yoga, tai chi and meditation. I eat freshly prepared organic meals everyday. I travel and explore the world further than my local high street. I enjoy quality time with Younger Dad and all our friends. I can come and go as I please and stay up into the wee hours enjoying film after film or the stimulation of a page turning novel or revel in sparky conversation around a dinner lit kitchen table.
Dalek Beach Party - One For The Ladies 3:50
One bit of advice is to consider how much of the school year you want to cover. My first completed draft (the one I showed my editor) took place over the whole school year. She advised that the story was spread too thin, there were too many lapses in time with no mention of what had happened, and suggested that the tension and pacing would be served by tightening it up to a few months. She was absolutely right (as usual!).
The awesomeness doesnt stop there! Check out the lyrics!
For the record I don't really think it tastes anything like tuna, but its delicious in its own right.
(One thing that is bothering me though. Is Lys really spelled as L-Y-S? The Paulinian in me is confused. Haha!)
Directions:
My to-go lunch shifted, set awkwardly
1 gallon vegetable stock
That’s, I think, how the majority of Americans think.
So, when I start discussing possibilities and consequences, weighing the validity of moral codes, religious dictums, and other externally imposed restrictions regarding sexual behavior versus the opposite free-wheeling who-cares extreme seemingly so prevalent these days, people know I’ll be conducting my own experiments. Hence, all the furor over my discussion regarding sex for a single-again woman in her forties.
Had a meeting with the doctor about my x-rays and MRI scan to see if they could do anything about my back problems.
When I gain consciousness I find myself face down and tightly bound to a wooden scaffold placed on top of the circular altar. A posture rather dishonourable, to tell the truth, since, having had my clothes removed my rear is offered to the sight of everybody.
Describing Maoists as the “most formidable threat” to the country’s security, India’s Home Minister Palaniappan Chidambaram has recently been emphasizing the need for more “men, weapons, and vehicles” to fight terrorism and establish a new National Counter-Terrorism Center. While the chief ministers of some regional state governments (particularly those ruled by opposition parties) have opposed Chidambaram, there can be no doubt that like him, they too feel that more must be spent on repression. Simply, they want to keep the control of “security” in their states in their own hands.
Institute, which is run by Peter G. Peterson, who is married to a
My friend, her husband, my dad, and my step mom came to help unpack the truck. It took 2 hours. Which was good. The boys I hired to pack it took an hour. I fell once. I gashed my knuckle. Which is now infected because I could not find a band-aid. I have a beautiful purple bruise the size of a quarter on my forearm. And every inch of my body aches. I am exhausted beyond belief.
The feeling of wonder,
*NOTE: FEES ARE DIFFERENT DEPENDING ON THE METHOD YOU CHOOSE FOR REGISTRATION: PAYPAL: $20 / CHEQUE OR MONEY ORDER: $25
So there you have it, my first very unfamily friendly post. But I believe that as mothers, wives, sisters, daughters, and whatever else, that we should treat ourselves every once in awhile. Most of the time, we make sure that everybody else is taken care of, has what they need, and never go without. So now, take the time to treat yourself!! Take a look at EdenFantasys! They also have great massage kits, oils, candles, all kinds of not so out there products lol. Things that even I would be comfortable buying, and wouldnt be embarrassed if my child somehow found my stash lol. But again, I am trying to be more adventurous! Lets hope I succeed in this journey! ;0)
Not knowing what the next moment will bring.
Now that I have small children and a wild dog I do not decorate every room.
J. Edgar is an overlong, ultra serious biography of J. Edgar Hoover, the man who ran the FBI with an iron fist for more than four decades. As it stands, this film would be a failure from any filmmaker, but as Clint Eastwood directed it, it has to be considered a major disappointment.
The Boca Raton Forum recently posted a nice article about Field of Flowers. We are very proud of our designers and their designs…
Today we're gonna go to the Military Appreciation (or whatever) thing. Andrea said thta Howie Mandell was gonna be there. Really? That's pretty cool. I just saw him on Leno the other day. He was wearing a full body germ suit to prevent himself from getting the swine flu. It was HYSTERICAL! Who knew that he was such a germophobic - LOL!
I was originally going to dry hop this one but have decided that there is already plenty of aroma and flavour in this one.
In contrast to this, I do regard 1939's ADVENTURES OF SHERLOCK HOLMES as an invigorating adventure, for all that it's partly based on the same stage-play as the 1922 SHERLOCK HOLMES:
Though we missed having the one the celebration was planned for, we were able to see the blessings right in front of us, and we will continue to believe in the work God is doing to bring a resolution to all this.
13. I’m not sure if I’m more sardonic or sarcastic. Perhaps sardoncastic.
First a strange stained glass design, depicting not church imagery, but Finnish saga. It is painted with oils on cardboard, a new experiment which I am not wholly sure about.. I like the way the paint dries quickly and enables you to make a scrubby translucent surface (which reminded me of coloured glass, hence the addition of black lead lines later).
We had decided of our choices to go to the Atlantic Ocean Beaches or the Gulf Coast Beaches which were an hour further away than the Atlantic Beaches we would prefer the Gulf Coast Beaches because they were said to be warmer and calmer than the Atlantic Beaches. So it was supposed to be about a 2 hour drive away from where we were. The Drive was about 2 hours away to the Town we were going to but then due to bad instructions it took us about another hour and a half to get to where we were going and then still did not ever end up on the Island we had planned on going to because we got there about 2:30pm the next ferry out to the Island did not leave until 3:35pm and the Island closed at 4:30pm and the ferry would cost us about $70 to take out to the Island. So we went to another Beach in the State Park System called Honey Moon Cove Beach system. We got there just after 2:30pm and they started picking up the Beach Chairs and Umbrella's at about 4:30, so Our day at the Beach turned into 2 hours at the Beach, but all was O.K. we had fun there anyway and the kids got their first taste of the Ocean and making sand castles!!!!
spent the morning
In 2008, the last year of W, they passed a Consumer Product Safety Improvement act, in the wake of the toys from China contaminated with lead. This sort of bill is guaranteed to pass - no one would oppose a bill to make kids' toys safer- except anyone with enough sense to read what was proposed. To sell toys, the seller must get expensive chemical tests done on them. There is a cottage industry of crafters who sell their products at flea markets and small shops, and there is a pretty large group of (typically older) guys who make some toys with their woodworking tools and sell them to help offset the cost of wood and help buy more tools. Then there's the small consignment shops who sell the baby hand-me-downs and old toys that people who don't plan on having more children need to get rid of. All of these activities would shut down because small business people can't afford these tests. Besides, the problem was toys from the major manufacturers in China - not one single hazard was traced to these small businesses. Our "Protectors" in Fed.gov said they would never go after second hand stores, consignment stores and church sales. In fact, they have. Anyone with any sense told them the problem wasn't grandpa selling a wooden truck he built, or grandma selling some dolls made of yarn, or you selling your kids' old toys; the problem was China, Inc's mass-manufactured toys. They won't listen. They know better than us.
i wonder if your keeper knows the way you shed
To harness the power of innovation, SAP invests in the development of its divers employees. We aspire to leverage the qualities and appreciate the unique competencies that each person brings to the company.
Would you brag about beating your toddler in a game of chess? About beating your 7-year-old in a running race?
I’m single now, but the song takes on a new meaning.
The Radisson Hotel Edinburgh is involved in a cycle relay, from Aberdeen to Jersey in which 32 other Rezidor hotels are also taking part. They aim to help raise money for local charities across the UK. Here is bit of poetry to explain more!
I had contemplated going out on my own as a post-production business, editing and doing animation and graphics and making original music, but it always seemed so risky and costly that I never made any real motions to do so. The company paycheck wasn’t much, but it was there. I had good benefits. I was OK, I thought . . . but I was stuck.
Wu WK, Su J, Huang MY. Epidemiological investigation on reproductive outcomes in acrylonitrile-exposed male workers. J Chin Ind Hygiene Occup Med 1994; 12: 261-263.
Notes: Instructions are written for a cuff-down sock. Two sizes are provided and the pattern includes different design options for the top of the foot. Both written and charted instructions are provided.
SOLUTION: RUN KEEPER app! This app is amazing and FREE! It uses GPS to log your runs outside and even has a voice coach that tells you when to pick up the pace depending on what your goals are. I love, love, love it! Also, I used a Personal Trainer in 2010 (as a birthday present to myself) and all of the moves he taught me are in the Jillian Michaels "30 Day Shred" video. It's $10 at Target, and the personal trainer, was, well, a lot more. Save your money, stick with Jillian. She will kick your ass through the TV NO problem!
I will probably resume gratitude posts on Christmas weekend, since my gifts *should* be made by then (!!!!), but if I don't, know that they will certainly return by the new year.
The new formation lies in wheat on Sutton Bank farm in the valley between the two. It appeared on the anniversary of the valley’s Olde Midsummer Festival which used to be held during the week of July 6th – ‘Old-Style’ equivalent of solstice night, transposed from the previous Julian calendar when in 1752 country people in Britain rebelled at being deprived of 11 days of their precious time.
Maternity clothes? None.
We then learn a bit about the highstorms. So apparently you can’t really do much during a highstorm, you just stay put in a sheltered place and wait until it passes. There’s some bits about the Stormfather, the Lost Radiants, and the Voidbringers – I guess it’s kind of like superstition to these people? Stormfather is THE god, I think, with the way they talk about him… probably the Almighty one too.
The germs in my throat have migrated South in a fit of pique so I'm now coughing like all get out and it's a delight to behold.
But Republicans in Congress are fighting against any regulations on banks. Is there anybody here who thinks Republicans really like the middle class?
Back in the day when I thought I might go to med or vet school, yes, I considered joining the military. I've obviously gone a different route since then. Note: this was before I met DH! Since meeting and marrying my military man I can say with 100% certainty that joining the military is not something I would consider now. Physically I could train for and kick basic training in the butt, mentally I could probably handle it too (not as if women are allowed into combat positions and most of my civilian training would mean that my likelihood of deployment would be low)...it's just not feasible for my family. I know it can and does work for others though! (including my aunt and uncle who were a dual military couple for something like 95% of both of their military careers; they're both retired now though.)
and then a battle of strength (yours vs theirs vs the threads on that quilt)
The first graphic novel I chose to read for this project was Neil Gaiman's Sandman volume 4. Why volume 4 and not 1? The short answer is that it's the only one that I own. Basically, I'm a fan of super-hero comics. I read the classics, and have been known to check out some weird indie stuff, but I mostly read super-hero stuff. I have this copy of The Sandman, because I ended up with it at the end of a particularly nasty break-up with a girl. I can't remember if she gave me the book as a gift, or if I just ended up with it when we stopped speaking.
and it has barely begun!
It's time to get ready, Bunny!
3. Metrical, rhyming texts are much harder to edit, because they are inevitably more highly structured. Whereas 500 words of prose can go through enormous revision and emerge greatly improved, 500 words in verse can only really be tinkered with or scrapped and rewritten entirely. Editors don’t need that kind of headache, especially if they’ve never worked with you before.
10-men were sent behind enemy lines as part of an elaborate scheme involving nationalist-Chinese soldiers escorting the crew of a downed American bomber across the Korean peninsula to be taken to China. The 10-men, each with their own specialty and purpose, were to be given no recognition, no credit, and no rewards for the mission which was to be classified until 1998, 46 years after the mission.
Located on top of a craggy Maui cliff...
You can visit Jeanne's beautiful shop here...
Much of what I hear, see and read now gets the mix all wrong. Everything is turned up an extra notch so you can hear it. It's all too loud. Too shrill. Too insistent. Further, there is no hierarchy. Everything, every voice, every instrument, every riff is of equal importance. It becomes a melange of all colors...black.
After, nearly losing my marriage my husband and I started fresh in a new church home. The church we were attending was leaving me frustrated. The time and commitment I was putting into it was taking it's toll on my marriage. One of the most sacred things to God, the union of a man and woman.
turned off all screens (DSI, computer, TV) for a whole Sunday (fear of solitude, discomfort not having pre-packaged entertainment or being in-the-know),
Back in the day this song was frequently used as a sobriety "test" because of its difficult melody. If a person could sing just one stanza - and stay on key - they were deemed sober enough to continue drinking. Due to the song's raunchy lyrics it quickly gained popularity and spread beyond the walls of The Anacreontic Society. It was so popular that it eventually hopped the pond and by the time Key wrote his famous poem the song was well known in America.
So a good week’s work on the art and craft front!
And by the way, who paid for that surplus through those increased taxes? We did - the baby boomers who are now being accused of sucking the life out of the system.
Victory -Yakima Glory
Also - did you know that my hubs is pretty cute every once in a while?
How, with my limited experience, was I to know that this wasn’t normal? I simply assumed that we lived in Scotland.
Chuck fact of the day: Before each filming of Walker: Texas Ranger, Chuck Norris is injected with fourteen times the lethal dose of elephant tranquilzer. This is, of course, to limit his strength and mobility, in an attempt to lower the fatality rate of the actors he fights.
Mexico’s attorney general also said the U.S. has not apologized for the violence inflicted by guns smuggled into Mexico under the watch of the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives in the secret program based out of the ATF’s field office in Arizona. Morales characterized the operation’s main tactic, letting guns “walk” into Mexico, if, she said, that is what actually happened, as a potential “betrayal.”
Top: Target
He had recently come back from a trip to Bologna, which I think he constructed specifically for the purpose of working out the most authentic version of the city’s eponymous sauce. This involved visiting eateries around the city, prying his way into their kitchens, chatting up the mamas and papas stirring and chopping away, and ferreting out the sauce’s sine qua non. (Types like this never do things by half measures.)
Rule 3: Possibly the most important: WALK your (m/f’n) talk! If you aren’t practicing what you are preaching, you have less value to me than the average politician or garden slug.
Savard: Who is in goals.
Today's song.
Before we left on our trip, I got a wild hair one night and decided to completely geek out this trip with the Mickey tie dyed t-shirts. I’d never made them before and was dealing with dye that doesn’t camouflage mistakes very well, so there was a slight learning curve. But the kids and I had a heckuvalot of fun making them and I thought they turned out pretty cute. Despite us being first timers.
“We” is a very tough word to use. Who is this “we” you are speaking of? I guarantee it doesn’t apply to me, because I am very thoughtful about how words are defined and used. The proof?—just read on, my friend . . .
They have listened.
Excuse me while I now run away and indulge in a spot of photography.
I can say with much certainty that I don’t get along well with my tutors. I think that comes with being a mature aged student. But even in the classes that are filled with older students (eg. my writing course) I feel even older and more difficult. I’m a challenger. I wont accept anything on face value and especially just because the lecturer says so. Who put them in charge anyway?!
And all the lies we've buried deep in the sand.
I hate waiting.
Just to give you a little more background on why Argentina, normally when we close here the middle of March we head for Puerto Vallarta in Mexico for R and R. Three years ago, the Argentine staff who has been begging us to come for years to visit finally connected and my wife and I went for 4 weeks to BA and then to our best friend, Gustavo who with his family owns a hotel in Carlos Paz. We visited there and to be honest, Argentina just blew me away. So different than I what I was expecting and I couldn't wait to get back. My wife who likes the summer here and the garden stayed behind when I went last summer, and I am coming again this summer. I really hate the hot, humid weather here in July, and loved the temps and weather last year in BA. I went skiing for a week in Ushuaia and that was fun, and will maybe go again this summer. I also took Spanish lessons, but my teacher said I am always asking too many questions and not a very good student.
Beginning at the Old Battleground trailhead, the first section is a relatively flat stretch along Horsepen Creek and the southern arm of Lake Brandt. After just a tenth of a mile, you’ll encounter one of the highlights of this part of the trail—a 200-feet long wooden walkway that snakes and bends its way through the forest. You’ll also find several great views of the creek and lake along the way where blue herons and egrets are common sights. The still waters make this area a great place for photographers looking to capture the water’s mirror-like reflection of the landscape. The first section ends at the Atlantic & Yadkin Greenway after about three-quarters of a mile.
This is where I bring in my older man, he has been great for me when it comes to my childhood and my struggles. I am not a good problem solver, I struggle with being about to say the things on my mind, I punish myself too often…it’s a real battle, more than most people know and understand. He understands me, gets it, takes the time to know what’s going on, takes the time to learn me, to help me…he listens. This is one major advantage to being with my older man, he is patient and understanding. When most people have walked away, he has stuck around and refuse to leave. He loves me no matter what, he understands I’m human, knows I make mistakes, and I am forever grateful to have him in my life. I need to be more like him in this part of the relationship. I used to forgive and forget too quickly and got hurt too much…I need to learn to do that again for him. I need to be better at this whole relationship thing and I plan on working on it for him. It’s time I get some help for myself, it’s time I break free from everything in my past. I want to be the best person I can be and I want to do better for myself and for him.
Oven Braised Artichokes with Garlic and Thyme
The day started out with clear blue skies, but clouds developed in the afternoon. I snapped this picture of the sky and mountains at an overlook on Newfound Gap road in North Carolina. You have to look closely, but you can see the sunbeams that attracted my attention. It took us longer to get home than it would have if we had taken the interstate, but the scenery certainly couldn’t be beat.
knees, and lower my face and whisper my lord, my master, my king.
If Merrie Haskell writes another middle grade book (which according to her website she is) I will read it in a heartbeat. I would recommend this book to anyone that loves fairytales, is looking for something a bit different, or that has an appreciation for mythology. This is the story I’ve been waiting to see/read since I was a child. A fairytale that while it had the promise of romance, it wasn’t the focal point; the heroine did what she had to do, there was suspense and intrigue and a whole lot of realism, chamber pots and nosebleeds, and just as much magic, invisibility caps and souls and magic wells. An amazing book and easily in my top three favorites of what I’ve read this year.
decided on the issue of disclosure of certified copy of question booklet of AIIMS-MBBS Entrance Examination, 2011 and the corresponding answer key. The Public Information Commissioner of AIIMS had initially refused the disclosure inter alia on the ground that the questions and answers were the intellectual property of AIIMS and exempted from
I'll do another roundup of results and plans in a couple of weeks.
I make my way to the ESPNZone with some folk I met at the bar. I had Tenaya Creek Nut Brown Ale, smelled and tasted like butter. Then they got me a sample of Tenaya's Winter Spiced Ale. A little cinnamon, a little dry. No thank you.
INITIAL ENTRY
I've been a bit silent for the last couple days only because I didn't have the energy, then time, to write. Wednesday, I felt really sick again. I'm at the point of desperation with these sinus infections. It appears that they're likely caused by indoor allergens, thus their seasonal nature of November through March or April. The fact that the Prednisone didn't just banish the symptoms--I'm still on it now, but I feel kind of crappy again today--is scary. So, I'm going down the path of trying whatever I can to banish allergens, plus it looks like I'll have to schedule a sinus x-ray and or CT scan to see if there's something structurally wrong. Lovely.
Good ridance i say. She just some lame act that was pumped up by cheryl to think she was something and could make it. But watch now how she’ll probably get a record deal after all this……. Ain’t it always the way, and wots this bout her 81year old nan??????
Were that joy unmixed with Thee. (Jesus, I My Cross Have Taken, Henry F. Lyte)
You know the hygiene protocol that you go through with each child, teaching them to wipe themselves and wash their hands? Let me advise you to revisit that training every year or two, asking them to visualize what is happening to that towel if they are not using warm water and soap to wash their hands... yeah.
In the Revelation of Jesus Christ chapters one and two we see Jesus revealing Himself to John the apostle while he is being held prisoner on the isle of Patmos for his faith in Christ and preaching the gospel of Christ. Oh, if there is ever a truer presentation of who Jesus is it is here. Jesus says to John,
Distress Inks - Wild Honey, Antique Linen, Shabby Shutters
he always talked
Brandom takes it that practical commitments stand in inferential relations with one another much in the way that theoretical commitments do: one can entitle us to others (e.g., a commitment to climb one of the world’s highest mountains provides a defeasible entitlement to a commitment to climb Everest) one can commit us to others (e.g., a commitment to climbing Everest implies a commitment to going to Nepal), and they can stand in relations of incompatibility with one another (e.g., a commitment to climbing Everest is incompatible with a commitment to remain in the UK). Brandom takes the ability to undertake practical commitments to be parasitic on the ability to undertake theoretical commitments (and thus takes practical reasoning to be dependent upon theoretical reasoning), because these inferential relations are inherited from the theoretical commitments whose propositional content they share (e.g., my commitment to climb Everest gets its inferential articulation from the corresponding theoretical commitment that I have climbed Everest, which implies that I have gone to Nepal, and that I haven’t stayed in the UK, etc.).
Button: Bazzill Basics
Polyunsaturated Fat0.5 g
One of the conditions in accepting the award is to pass it along to five more blogs (or 6 if you can't narrow it down). So here are some of my favorite blogs that I would love to share some love with - if you have a moment please go visit them and then come back and leave a comment here and I will enter you for a giveaway.
Total
The Life Application Bible study note makes this interesting observation concerning this passage: “A life without God can produce a bitter, lonely, and hopeless old age. A life centered around God is fulfilling; it will make the “days of trouble” – when disabilities, sickness, and handicaps cause barriers to enjoying life – satisfying because of the hope of eternal life. Being young is exciting, but the excitement of youth can become a barrier to closeness with God if it makes young people focus on passing pleasures instead of eternal values. Make your strength available to God when it is still yours – during your youthful years. Don’t waste it on evil or meaningless activities that become bad habits and make you callous. Seek God now.”
ISBN-13: 978-0768440485
In the third Bardo the soul encounters the Lord of Death, a fearsome demonic deity who appears in smoke and fire, and subjects the soul to a Judgment. If the dead person protests that he has done no evil, the Lord of Death holds up before him the Mirror of Karma, "wherein every good and evil act is vividly reflected." Now demons approach and begin to inflict torments and punishments upon the soul for his evil deeds.
between the pages our old black bible
“And we will have common projects with people from other cultures. We will develop the intercultural skills of journalists, school pupils and artists and exchange people from these groups with (Muslim) colleagues. We will manage art and cultural productions. We will train the school teachers and influence their education to be multicultural.
In 1947 Thor Heyerdahl set out on an epic adventure across over four thousand miles of pacific ocean to prove a theory about the settlement of the pacific islands. He would source and build a traditional raft of balsa wood on which to make his journey. He was determined as far as possible to be authentic in his endeavour, and, despite some modern kit, a radio and the use of steel wire instead of vines as a material to tie the raft together with, he achieved his aims spectacularly. He and his fellow travelling companions were towed from a Chilean port and began their journey across the ocean. The currents were favourable and suggested this was a plausible theory.
You want the short version or the long version? The short version is that Agony Aunts is identical to Agony Uncles, in that it gathers up some funny and not-so-funny women to talk about relationships. Their replies are cut off before the any of the women can complete a full thought and are accompanied by the monotonous narration of creator Adam Zwar. Agony Uncles was the television equivalent of the inane ‘What Do Blokes Really Think?’ column you’d find in a women’s mag and the only reason Agony Aunts is marginally better is because the women Zwar speaks to are funnier than the men. Take Judith Lucy out of this episode of television and the number of laughs drop by half.
"Just a minute," says the minister. "That man was a taxi-driver and he gets a silken robe and golden staff. How can this be?"
Quarterback
It's so easy to become self-centered in a crisis such as this but I was trying to remember that I wasn't going through it alone. Tammy was by my side every step of the way and I knew Rachel was concerned. She saw my Facebook update and texted both of us: "Id like to be in the loop about this whole hospital business. So someone call me when u can."
Check out the Healthy Relationship Quiz at the link below!
We mustn’t, O mustn’t, just mustn’t show fear.
His primary concern in this essay is methodology, specifically to demonstrate the paradigmatic shift required of Christian theology considering the Modern fact. Troeltsch wants to contrast two opposing methods, the historical-critical and the dogmatic method, but he wants to show that dogmatics, while giving the appearance of historical grounding, fails to take into account the fullness of the Modern Fact and the inevitable attenuated grounds for Christian dogmatics.
Take a deep breath. It's time to sew a circle.Set your circle of background fabric right-side-up on the table. Now set the contrasting circle on top, right-side-up, aligning your compass points with the seams and points of the background fabric. Starting at the north point, flip the outer edge of the contrast fabric towards the center of the background circle so that the press mark on the contrast fabric meets the corresponding seam or point. Pin the fabrics right-sides together. Rotate 90 degrees and repeat for east, south, and west.
Jason asked me to share my recipe for potato kugel with you all. This is the best potato kugel you will ever eat. It’s a pain in the ass to make, but so worth it. Originally, it was created for Rosh Hashanah in 2005, but I made it for the next couple of Passovers as well. However, since we have started eating more healthfully, I have avoided making it. It is just too damn good, I can’t trust myself to be near it. Let alone making the extra dish to keep at home. Oy!
She didnt respond, or call me back, which is obviously all I wanted. I was, not quite consciously at the moment, trying to push her buttons, trying to get her to respond, trying to get her to do what I wanted, which was come over here and make me feel better about the situation. Since she didnt, I was just falling further into my realm of irrationality, consumed by what I saw as the fact that she did not care about me, how unloved I was, and how she was abandoning me after promising me that she never would. After a couple of hours of not hearing from her, I sent her another email saying for her not to come over here tomorrow (Saturday).
Some days they do; some days they don’t. I’m excited to say I’m coming up on 300 days of writing in a row at 750words.com. At a minimum daily count, that’d be over 222k words.
Karna is an experienced hunter and prefers close combat with his prey. He is handy with his blade. He has never killed a sentient and would prefer not to, but if he has, like he now does, he will do so with great regret but no hesitation at all.
No, not that kind of bedroom story (although, I am sure I could think of few good ones).
We have several fabrics to choose from for all your dog snood needs.
Thank you Sheila for all you do for my son, Wind.
Candy Mountain, Candy Mountain! This series of videos, posted on YouTube, is mainly about a poor unicorn named Charlie who has to deal two other unicorns with identical voices, one pink, and one blue. The two sidekick unicorns enjoy luring Charlie into adventures that usually end up with Charlie missing a kidney or other organs. You can view these videos by searching ‘Charlie the Unicorn’ on YouTube.
Santorum did not address the controversy surrounding his 2008 speech at a Catholic university in Florida where he said Satan was “attacking the great institutions of America.”
After the weekend we'll spend a few days gradually wending our way across to Adelaide where we'll stay for 9 days, primarily to watch the National Hockey League finals, but also to see the sights of this beautiful city and surrounds. Russell will join us for the first weekend in Adelaide during his one-week flying visit from Belgium.
to order a St. Peter's fish (tilapia).
Today I turned 25. Twenty five!! I have a tradition of writing happy birthday posts every year. This time I am writing this post from my android mobile.. something I planned on my last birthday.
I'm going down to Hayle soon. Should I knock on the door?
First, the books made me aware of how little time we have in which to make our short lives sweet. The juxtaposition of vampire life and human life is stark. Human life is short and, despite our best intentions, probably meaningless in the grand scheme of things. So, to the extent that we have the capacity for a truly Meaningful life, we will probably die long before we have a chance to realize on it. Previously, I had viewed my fungibility as limited to Biglaw. All of a sudden, “SURPRISE SAMANTHA!”, said the Universe, “I agree with your vapid bosses — you are intrinsically irrelevant.”
I went round to pick the car up, and found the exhaust they had got was too short. If it was just an inch, the mechanic said, you could bolt it on under tension, but not that far. I went under the ramp, and saw it was indeed too short, so I went away again. The first replacement was even shorter. They got another exhaust system, and fitted it by the following evening.
I suppose that’s why they call it ‘formative’. Have we failed to properly take advantage of those ground breaking opportunities and are we paying for it now? Are we simply asking too much of folks that are basically already fully formed, but WITHOUT an appreciation of art in their make-up? Are we really only trying to change peoples’ minds that have already been made up?
Greetings to my illustrious fellow artisans,
Teach Me, Delirium, and Pandemonium, for example. I read them furiously but also felt humbled and moved by the prose and the stories themselves in a way that will stick with me for a long time. The Fault in Our Stars was maybe a cake book, but it's hard for a book about cancer to be a cake book. But still.
I started this blog a few months ago, but told myself I would NOT write anything until I felt the time was right. Well, the time is now!
Olly Murs, Tulisa, Jimmy Cliff and Cher Lloyd will be playing on the Saturday.
Ali had a greater warrior spirit than most men three times her size.
PILM: How did you get into the music and entertainment business?
-Exclude fina space structures and exterior wall thicknesses from FAR calculations to encourage thick heat absorbing walls and a varied street wall.
I am also addicted to Facebook. Which normally isn't a problem. I love seeing what my friends have to say on a somewhat regular basis. Until recently.
your website by warping the text like wrought
Small business, one of the largest components of the economy, is hurting because consumers are cutting back on spending. It is no surprise either that the banking community, under direct attack by the President, is reluctant to stick its neck out. The result is an understandable reluctance to extend credit and loans, and a loss of investor confidence.
I had my first ride on the back of a motorcycle at age 15. I was immediately hooked, but it wasn’t till I’d been living in San Francisco for almost a year that a friend of mine at work happened to mention the MSF (Motorcycle Safety Foundation) class. Until then, I had no idea there was a class one could take to learn how to ride; I assumed I’d have to find a patient biker friend. I cut the conversation short, RAN upstairs to my desk, and phoned to reserve a spot in the class.
Others will ask, why don’t we leave immediately? That answer is also clear: We must give Afghanistan the opportunity to stabilize. Otherwise, our gains could be lost and al Qaeda could establish itself once more. And as Commander-in-Chief, I refuse to let that happen.
﻿- Small Tag from Tags, Bags, Boxes and More Cricut Cartridge cut at 3.25
now let’s not be naïve about this
Our backyard chicken adventures began six years or so ago when our daughter ( then 8 ) fell in love with a batch of baby chicks at a friends house and the rest is history. We knew nothing about keeping chickens when we started out, but in true homeschooling fashion we followed the " chicken " rabbit trail all the way to the library, Internet, and eventually to our local feed store where we placed an order for eight laying hens!
– Hirahata Seito
In 1787 the Northumberland Glass Company obtained a lease on some land at Lemington from the Duke of Northumberland and set up four glasshouses. Glass manufacture continued on the site until 1882 when it stopped and the land was leased to Spencer’s Iron Works. Glass making moved to a different site in Lemington.
Protein rest at 125 degrees for 30 minutes
More Black Bunny Fiber--this fabulous 50% Blue-faced Leicester/50% silk has been incredible to spin. Have you figured out that I'm a big BBF fan? Carol is one of the finest dyers, with great taste in fiber. You can't go wrong with her stuff.
A Piece on the joys of the epigraph and how they can be used to great effect in your writing. Well, other peoples writing really, but you could apply the understanding gleamed here to your own.
Screw it. I'm going to open that new bottle of Laphroaig.
The little girl called her grandmother later that day on the phone and asked her the same question, “Grandma, why do cut the ends off of the ham before you cook it?” The little girl’s grandmother responded, “Oh, sweetie, I’m not really sure. I think it is so the juices will be absorbed better. Call your Nana. She is who I learned it from.”
Hot Cross Buns, Maror and Matzah, and shelled, salty peanuts. The flavor of potential beginnings.
I'd also like to enter this too the following challenges:
Then, I took a blender marker and dipped it into a big bottle of colorless blender solution and dripped it onto the colored areas. Simple, fun, washed-out coloring.
People please, put your clothes on!!!
I thought I'd wear these toe socks. When you've got so little between your feet and the mean Brooklyn streets, every little bit of fiber counts. I'd heard you needed to start slow, so I decided to go for a mile. That's a short distance, right? So I went on a wonton soup run. I ran a few blocks north and did a short loop that ended at my favorite local Chinese restaurant.
The boys and I went to an MLK event with music and other entertainment, had an African drum lesson, ate soul food. Then four hours of "Laser Tag." Last night we ate reubens at the Jewish deli and then went dowtown, to tour a possible middle school for Ezra.
If what I said doesn't inspire you to get off the couch and put your cozy blanket away, head over here. And while you're there, meet two new friends, Todd and Diane, if you haven't made their acquaintance already. (If they don't get you into a festive mood that makes you want to get out, just settle in till spring and wait for Ice Cream Day*.)
1191 **D-VIII/11/1994. “Socrates on the Things Far Worse Than Death: The Second Speech in Plato’s Apology.” Faculty Workshop, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(4), above, pp. 604-18.)
Looking unto Jesus through the storms!
Smith sighed heavily. “All right. Tomorrow afternoon then. 2pm.”
James and Mary took off toward James’ house to help Marlene in the delivery of their fourteenth child. Mary loved being a grandmother. She took pride in telling everyone what a wonderful mess of grand kids she had. Howie started back down that ladder. This is when the heavy bags shifted and came crashing down on top of Howie knocking him off the ladder, pinning him to the floor. With no one knowing he was in trouble, Howie laid there, praying for someone to find him. He died that evening from internal bleeding. The injuries which took his life couldn’t have been repaired, even if he had been found. This was a time when advanced medicine wasn’t much more than a stethoscope and a tongue depresser. It wasn’t until the following day, when he didn’t show up for supper, that his body was found, by his father. Everyone attended the funeral and Summer was literally beside herself. She married and widowed twice, before she turned fifteen was as devastating as it could be to such a young woman. Both of her husbands died in terrible accidents and this caused folks to start calling Summer “the black widow.” This only added salt to her wounds of loss.
Last year’s Chinese New Year started on the 3rd February 2011 and welcomed the year of the Rabbit. Curious fact is that 兔 is the Chinese character for rabbit and is pronounced “tu”, same as the English “to”, hence many Chinese who speak English liked to wish a happy new year by saying “Happy New Year 兔 you!”.
“The Farmer at War” tells the story of white farmers in Rhodesia. This is what I mean by learning from REAL EVENTS folks. This on line book is a real gold mine full of gems of reality-based experience you can learn from. Reality may not be as fun as killing raiders or shooting it out with UN goons in a holier than thou chairborne commando wet dream, but it is much more useful for realistic survival.
A few years after the Batang Kali massacre, the Briggs Plan was put in place to win the hearts and minds of the local population. Devised by General Sir Harold Briggs shortly after his appointment in 1950 as the Emergency’s director of operations, the plan comprised the forced resettlement of rural Chinese population into “New Villages” where education, health services and homes with water and electricity were provided. Even as the Emergency continued and news remained tightly controlled, the Batang Kali massacre reared its ugly head from time to time. Soon after the incident, in 1949, an investigation by the Attorney General, Sir Stafford Foster-Sutton, concluded that the villagers would have escaped with their lives if not for the soldiers opening fire – yet, no action was taken.
I’m anchored in Rockaway Beach, finishing my novel (two chapters to go) and have been derelict in my Captain’s Logs. But the writer’s life for me! Here be your latest news, confirmed gossip and tip for the week.
The next stop on the tour encompassed three sites. The first was Trinity College where one can see the Book of Kells on display in the Library. The Book of Kells is an illuminated manuscript of the Gospels that was finished sometime around the year 800.
‘Nice. So then we sell charter cruises to tourists, who sail around the island all day lobbing rockets at them. Plus, we don’t give them any food, so they’re eating one another. The scumbags, like, not the tourists.’
1½ cups rice flour (I used brown)
Hampe said he was sitting in a cart when shouting began between the two groups from a distance. He said Hines then began hitting balls at them from about 200 yards away.
This is intensely personal for me, because there are so many whom I want to see saved, who seem so stubborn in their unbelief. It breaks my heart. I need to remember that it breaks God’s heart far more, because He literally loves each of them enough to send His Son to die for them. There is even one who comes to church regularly, but loves his pet sin too much to be willing to let go of it to receive life. I have no wisdom or strength to get through to these people, so I need to keep praying for them and allowing God’s love to flow through me to them. The man I will see tonight is a particular case in point. Pride is his prison, and he doesn’t even see that the door is already open. It is the Holy Spirit who convicts of sin, righteousness and judgment, (John 16:8-11) so I need to be fully available for however He wants to use me in bringing this man to repentance and faith. That actually is true of everyone to whom I minister, so humble, trusting obedience must be my constant attitude.
I also wore a necklace that has the engagement Old World diamond that has been passed down in my family for generations, last given to my Mom from my Dad. They had the diamond made into a necklace....I couldn't have wanted to wear anything more than this piece!
I’ll also be helping out with other projects this summer, including Human Impacts Assessment of Campsites (and Trails?) in Kachemak Bay State Park with my boyfriend (and Rachel?), and potentially Calcification Rates of Pycnopodia helianthoides in Jakolof Bay, Alaska with Tyler. I’m up for trying whatever I can get my hands on at this point.
A key principle of Sitte’s that important buildings should not be placed in the centre of a place.
Deniersaurus-Rex
In addition, there has been a large push to get some of these homes that are foreclosed upon or short sales off the market by encouraging investors to buy them. It is working as investors have been snapping up homes at bargain prices and often times in all-cash deals, which makes the competition for traditional home buyers a little stiffer.
When he really didn’t want to,
Here are the team performances with an overview on what could be done to improve. All suggestions are creative critism and advice for improvement.
Ever consistent the BBC took Malcolm X the American Black Power leader to Marshall Street in February 1965 to film for their current affairs programme “Tonight”. He told the world’s media,” I have come here because I am disturbed by reports that coloured people in Smethwick are being badly treated. I have heard they are being treated as the Jews under Hitler. I would not wait for the Fascist element in Smethwick to erect gas ovens.” I wonder who he heard that off! He told the London Times that the BBC had taken him there for a programme on “race”. This was nine days before he was assassinated after his return to the States.
Since 1995, Kinofilm has put on festivals and events, mainly in Manchester, supporting over 3000 filmmakers, screening short films from over 20,000 international submissions. Kino Film have provided a platform to emerging filmmakers, many of which have gone on to become some of the UKs top independent filmmakers, including; Lynne Ramsay (We need to talk about Kevin),Damien ODonnell (East is East), Brian Percival (A Boy Called Dad), Kolton Lee(Freestyle), David Whitney (Kandahar Break) and Jez Lewis (Shed your Tears and Walk Away). Patrons of Kinofilm include Bruno Coppola, Steve Coogan, Henry Normal, Maxine Peake, John Robb and the late Tony Wilson.
Compression format or standard – a format is a document (the standard), a way of storing data, while a codec is a program (an implementation) which can read or write such files. In practice, however, “codec” is sometimes used loosely to refer to formats.
With kick-ball-change and smooth heel turns,
and a half-dozen pillows (where in
Tamarind juice to taste
We settled on this – a large amount of hooks against the wall under our cupboards. Doesn’t it look fab? The previous storage solution was a large, messy, overfilled drawer that never shut properly. I like this better.
. . . that I am finally settling down from vacation. WTH is that about? It's taking almost longer than the damn vacation to get back to normal. Could it be I have no normal and that's the problem? hehehe
“Huge weekend for retailers, restaurants, hotels, means a lot to us,” said Mike Standing, owner of Waterman’s Grille. “This is the biggest draw I believe for the Oceanfront, for the city, for the entire year, because it attracts all different types of people.”
The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim. I enter cautiously, and with some apprehension. The place is a mess. Plates, saucepans, goblets are strewn everywhere—the place looks as though it hasn’t been cleaned for hundreds of years. Cobwebs adorn the corners of the rooms, adding softness. Dirt and dust has gathered in dunes along the edges of the walls, sculpted by the shuffling footfalls of the cursed occupants.
The Judge went on to add: “I find that oral and documentary evidence is sufficient to hold that as a result of the love affair, physical intimacy developed between Kamaljit Singh and Harpreet Kaur, which then resulted in her pregnancy”.
The idea of all, of the Western world one and inseparable,
And, don't get me wrong, there are a lot of things that I am not crazy about. But I also have to admit that I don't hate it like I thought I would. The days are easy, low stress and pass (reasonably) quickly. Lunches are catered almost every day (thank you, pharmaceutical reps!), and there are no nights and no weekends.
This don't feel right and I sense that she's trying to bore the pants right off of me,
One of my favourite lines is when the bloodhound team head off in an RV and their friends cheer them on with, "If you're tired pull over. If you're hungry, eat something."
Wedding workouts are a common thing for couples to go through preparing for the big day. We are no different from many others! Derek has always enjoyed working out and punching his punching bag, but since we have moved and live in a small apartment we don’t have room for all of his weights and his punching bag. He has been to the University gym a few times but it is hard to find time around classes and around the athletes workouts. Plus the gym is often crowded from other students trying to fit in their work out.
The Contour Brush has a slightly doomed, rounded shape. Though I seldom contour, this does fit well in the cheek hollows. I tend to use this for blusher (when I want a pop of colour on the apples on the cheeks) and highlighting.
I was hoping that Marvel would have improved a bit, and it seems in some areas they have. The current run of the Hulk comics doesn’t bode well for me sticking around for very long, although Captain America is enjoyable. I would like to get caught up on X-Men, but that is going to be a whole other post, but the fundamental basis of the problem is the same. Marvel cares more about marketing and profit than good storytelling.
The top is zinc. Which I have been in love with for awhile. Theirs is $800.00! YIKES! I think you could make one for a fraction of the price. The legs look a lot like fence posts and the rest of the design is very clean lined and simple. A little white paint and distressing, buy a sheet of zinc and form over a plywood top and….. voila!
My mother had taken me to the store to get some clothes. If she suggested some items from a particular rack, that meant the price didn’t matter. What mattered was how it would fit, and how it looked on me.
Ideally, everyone should be able to post entries; however, to maintain a sense of decorum, it is sometimes best to allow all management to have access to post entries while everyone else in the company should have access to post comments. Typically easier to pitch to the execs than an external blog, internal blogs are also substantially easier to implement with buy-in from senior management, as the content isn’t viewable from external sources.
Thinly slice your potatoes
Kids won't outgrow these towels by the time they turn 6 months (unlike the store-bought versions) because they're made with full sized bath towels. In fact, they'll fit as long as kids are still into the hooded towel thing! And no pointy-head syndrome here, since I square off the hood when I sew them.
You are huge, you are energetic, you are lovable.
So I saw few malaria in Zimbabwe, although I had malaria and treated many cases when I worked in Liberia.
Status Quo
1. Candidate first and last name, attach profile
Can you picture the game of Statue? John tossing Mary … Kay landing sideways and having to hold it for, how long? How about Jump Rope? Do you remember the rhymes? Double rope? I’ll stick with one for now! I see the neighbors who aren’t jumping playing clapping games!
Less than 12 hours after a train was stalled at Clementi MRT station for 20 minutes due to a ‘train fault’, trains to Pasir Ris along the East-West line were delayed for 30 minutes this morning as a result of a ‘train fault’ yet again.
But, that’s what happened and that’s where the defending myself with fists started. Over the next few years, I found that fists worked better then words to stop the bullies. Not my best years.
The bar is well stacked. Carrying the major brands with very creative bartenders. The only setback is that the price of drinks tends to be higher than in other places, especially if you go for the flashy drinks.
Can be stored in covered jar in the fridge for a month or two.
about? The initial good cheer just after arrests and mass decloakings
- He explains cooking. I am a pretty good home cook but I have to say that sometimes I wonder what I need to add to make my dish pop. He gives explanations about how to add acid, salt and just what would make a difference.
The rain has passed over for the day as the evening sweeps in from the East. Hoping for a lot more if the wells are going to resume full flow! I still haven’t moved the logs as the rain has continued unabated for most of the day. Added to this is the task of clearing out the barn in order to stack the logs, which is pending…ahem!
The government has paid lip service to community ownership, the idea that communities can buy or take over land or building when being sold by the government, but has given then no preferred status or discounted rate. A system could be created whereby a credible community not for profit group has preferential status in purchasing assets such as sites for housing (community land trusts), libraries, schools and pubs if they are otherwise being sold off, and can buy them at a reduced rate (perhaps with generous loan scheme from a state investment bank).
To download a free digital book for your PC visit MobiStories.com, click on Summer (in the Ages 2 - 4 category) add it to the cart along with Michelle Obama (Ages 6-10) then enter the code SUM0710 in the Coupon Code Box.
His career spanned America's generations (the Greatest Generation, the Baby Boom, Generation X, and Generation Y) as well as the generations of news and media: radio, broadcast television, cable, and the Internet era. The following interview is one of his best, and in it Wallace faces off against Frank Lloyd Wright in 1957. Frank Lloyd Wright's career also spanned several generations, and he died a couple of years after this interview took place.
It took one coat of spray primer and about 5 thin and even coats of the Lagoon color to get good coverage. I waited about 1/2 hour in between coats. I love the way it looks and it really highlights to cool shape of the lamp base. I bought a fun lamp shade from Target and now my new lamp is living happily on my craft desk, waiting for the rest of the room to get done!
The clipboard is small - maybe 6" x 9"? - so i can easily add my favourite 4x6 photos and swap them out when I need a change of scenery.
First, you draw the design that you want on your eraser with the ballpoint pen. Obviously an eraser is kind of teeny, so you will need to choose something that will fit. Like the original blog, I did a triangle and a heart and then I wanted to do a cute umbrella card, so I also added a rain drop.
Time. By Penny Dowdy. Illus. by the author. 2008. 24p. Crabtree Publishing Company, (9780778743446). Gr. 1-2.
I love smoothies, I drink them all the time. Over the past few months I’ve been trying to not use so much yogurt and got it down to a tablespoon. Which, is still yummy btw. I’ve even added peanut butter to liven things up, which it does, but it was rarely filling and always too sweet for breakfast…I’m an odd duck, most days the only sweet thing I want first thing in the morning is my partially sweetened coffee.
Exactly half of the voters thought that Sean Connery was the Bond actor who would make the best Perry Mason. Pierce Brosnan was the next closest with 30%. Maybe I should have added George Lazenby to the list? Nah, I didn't think so.
Ironically the McLaren was using the Inerter at the time, and despite it being used for the same function was not banned and remains legal and in universal use to this day.
2 modern
Loving each other
A friend said to me this week - "you don't have a problem,
She leaves him after saying her two cents and taking the money he “threw” at her earlier.
Levon came down and shook our hand vigorously, and put his hand on my shoulder, and he told us how glad he was to see us. He told us that Joe, his guitarist and Steve's friend, was on his way over, and he asked us if we needed anything. I said I needed a glass of water, beating myself up over my nervousness, and he directed me towards the glasses, and I gulped down the best-tasting water I'd had in ages. We sat down and he asked Steve whether the place was easy to find, and we said that it was a little difficult, but we were here now. He laughed, and then launched into what he wanted for this documentary he was planning. At this point, I deferred to Steve, and just reveled in this place where I was, trying to take it all in.
Anita's story is the best Betty MacDonald Fan Club story ever beside Wolfgang Hampel's Betty MacDonald and Ma and Pa Kettle biography and his magical Betty MacDonald Interviews.
Until you’ve been drawn into our community, it might be confusing to understand how an individual like Renee can steal your heart. How can Renee’s suffering wrench your heart until you believe it will break? Yet, Renee’s love and joy was a magnet for those of us who knew and loved her. Joanne Semenuck knew her when she was in school. She said, “She was the happiest young woman I ever met.”
Is payment enough, and with that we will trust,
I think that's all I have to share. I've got to put my bathrobe on over my clothes so I'll be warm. I'm a great sufferer of the cold.
Check 'em out and give 'em some love.
In 1983, he went back to Vietnam circ. 1968 in a Project Backslip op and accidentally ran into himself. He was curious to find out what would happen if he killed himself but he was stopped by a third version of himself from 1987. This lead to a sanction of two boring years on the Moon.
Dairy: 1
As in, "Did you wash your teapot?"
Please stop by Bloggabella for more of the release images - I've only seen these two and the teasers she has put on her blog & SCS so I'm excited to see the rest
Ok, I know this is superficial, but seriously. Who out there doesn't like getting presents? And people like buying cute baby things and giving them to you! It's awesome! And since she's not here yet I get to open them all!!! It's like they are all for me!
Capitalism lifts people out of poverty. When socialistic ideas are incorporated, that’s when things take a turn for the worst. The closest history has came to capitalism is a period in the 19th century. Even then, government intervention stole that away with large subsidies and political favors. But why did these things happen? Why the need for reform? Not because of capitalism. It is because the government had to take care of the intervention it had forced on the markets in the later part of the 19th century i.e. with the majority of industrial endeavors it subsidized (Standard Oil, American Steel, Big Tobacco, etc.)
of flowers. He knelt beside her
6. I'm not THAT kind of homeschooler.
If you live in a common interest community, take a moment to read your declaration and bylaws. You may be surprised at how much authority these documents assign to the board of directors on your behalf.
% IN LAIR: 25%
from SPS & TCPF
I have been meaning to write about this for absolutely ages, I’ve had it for months and it’s a pretty unique product because it will cover anything. Don’t believe me? Check this out. Those guys at dermablend really do know what they’re doing.
My guess is you’ll come back to us screaming and grateful. My hope is that you’ll beg us to just let you study.
Paul Verhoeven (Showgirls)
The band is offering a free show to anybody who is willing to:
I have a trustee that manages my investments in a blind trust. That was so that I would avoid any conflicts of interest. That trustee indicated last week, when he was asked about this, he said that he wanted to diversify the investments that I had. And for awhile he had money in a Swiss account, reported in the U.S., full taxes paid on it, U.S. taxes.
Differences. There is no person on this earth who is identical to another person on this earth. Even twins have differing personalities.
The paper is from Bildmalarna, and I've distressed the edges with Walnut Stain ink, and sewn them using that great top stitch thread from the Ribbon Girl again. The taffeta ribbon is also from there. I don't tend to use buttons on my cards and I found this one in a bag of Christmas coloured ones and don't have a clue where it's from. The flowers are from Wild Orchid Craft. The dies that the sentiment is on are from Whimsy, I bought the tiny tab letters off eBay an age ago.
Me: What else do you love?
On May 3rd, BtoB will release their new digital single, “Father”, which is a part of the ‘Emotions, Human Project Part 1‘.
Where do I start? First off, this is gonna be a MAJOR picture overload!!! :) We moved! Not into our cabin we're building (sadface!) but into a new house that we're renting! It's super cozy and feels like home! 4 bedrooms, plus a playroom, and a fenced in backyard! And it's like right down the street and around the corner from my Momma! :) Here's a few pics of it! :)
Through their research, they discovered that a low-fat diet, in combination with omega-3 fatty acids, did little to reduce the IGF-1 levels in the blood.
Fresh Express, bringer of last month’s E Coli is now proud to present you with your first case of infection with Listeria monocytogenes. What a great company. And just think: You don’t have to live anywhere near Salinas to enjoy their special nutrients. They ship all over the place, because they are so special.
The dwarves
On the 3rd May local elections take place: already propaganda leaflets and newsletters are tumbling through letterboxes on their way to the recycling bins. The three main parties desperately strive to maintain the fiction of genuine differences between them.
3. I hate continental cuisine.
Once the teachers were involved, ex hopped on board, as absolutely reluctant as he's been with me for years. It's been harder with J, but I told him what's happening isn't working, so we're going to try something else. If it doesn't work, then fine. I didn't elaborate on how hard it is to get the right med at the right dosage. Alas. Of course when I told him I would be taking him whether he wanted to or not, he said he would not go and it's just like my philosophy about babies and kids being victims of the medical system, captive audiences to get treatments they don't want. He's too smart for his britches. Somehow, I was able to tap dance out of that one.
Have a great day ya'll!! Another post coming tomorrow featuring my favorite mister for his special day (not that he even reads my blog)!!!
